Letter 1: 124 B.C.
The Afrikaner, or Boer, people of South Africa were internationally demonized like no other people in history.
Award recipients in several national categories, as well as the overall Ernst & Young Entrepreneur Of The Year National Award winner, will be announced at the annual awards gala in Palm Springs, Calif., on Nov. 12. The awards are the culminating event of the Ernst & Young Strategic Growth Forum, the nation’s most prestigious gathering of high-growth, market-leading companies, which will be held November 9 to 13.
i think i have always had an inclination to play the glad game. in pollyanna, her father taught her to look on the bright side of things. when she got a pair of crutches from charity rather than a doll, her father told her to be glad she didn’t need the crutches.
But I wanted to give it a little update and French Flair.
we went to my aunts house to decorate cookies... but we showed up late. we didn't get to decorate them. but we did get to eat them.
Soon, my vision (or what I could decipher from it) was blocked by a big black blurr… like someone’s head…. like Karan’s head!
The usual procedure in these “honor killings” is as follows: the family appoints one member to perform the actual slaughter (preferably a teenager in order to get a milder sentence) and the courts will prosecute that man only. But not so this time: The Danish Courts want to set an example and eventually hold the entire family responsible. What that means is: hold Islam responsible.
As it turns out, my little fur-child managed to get herself quite the irritating skin infection. Poor baby.
Now, I don’t mean to be crass, but I didn’t make this next one up. I’m simply the messenger. There’s an item on the adult market called a “fleshlight”. The fleshlight is in the shape of a flashlight, only the front of the fleshlight contains a plastic vajayjay as opposed to any kind of light bulb. What are people (men) supposed to do with the vajayjay part of the fleshlight? Well, I hate to be Captain Obvious, but they’re supposed to feck it, of course. I am all for adults doing whatever the hell they want in the bedroom. I try not to judge (unless it’s funny). So, if you want to make sexy time with a flashlight, that’s your business. However, now we have programming on television that consists of a man who is “addicted” to his car. He thinks he’s in a relationship with it. His love is so strong that he gets down on the floor, legs under the grill, arms draped around the hood, while he makes-out with the bumper. I’m not making this up. What I am saying is maybe the fleshlight is a gateway drug to finger-banging your car. Maybe this love of inanimate objects starts even earlier than the fleshlight. Maybe it goes all the way back to here…
You filled the hall with flower petals.
Alexander Payne, The Descendants
Three minutes went by and a middle aged man noticed there was musician playing. He slowed his pace and stopped for a few seconds and then hurried up to meet his schedule. A minute later, the violinist received his first dollar tip: a woman threw the money in the till and without stopping continued to walk. A few minutes later, someone leaned against the wall to listen to him, but the man looked at his watch and started to walk again. Clearly he was late for work.
Including me, so if you'll allow me to just rip off the band-aid...
One of the trends that most alarms me about contemporary thinking, say within the United Nations, is this drive to speed up the movement of people from the countryside into the cities so that you can industrialise the countryside. If you've got the people in the cities, the theory goes that it's much easier to supply them with food, warmth and energy, and you industrialise nature.
2. Lost my job. Bad times.
I kept looking at one of the pecan trees at different angles. The branches were doing all sorts of amazing things and the open pecan shells had long dropped their pecans but were hanging on and making incredible silhouettes against the early sun sky. I took several photos, and will no doubt return for more from time to time.
Agent One: DRUGS! DRUGS!! MORE DRUGS!!! Didn't you go to Interrogation 101 at the Academy? We need a court order, but all we have to tell the judge is he's crazy, and he will be totally insane after we give him the drugs.
with liquid applique. I stamped the sentiment
Azshara has always been one of my favorite zones, especially the trees with the falling leaves – an eternal Autumn (my favorite season).
“Ok. When was the last time you had sex?”
I deeply appreciate the words of African-American novelist Paule Marshall, who said, “Once you see yourself truthfully depicted, you have a sense of your right to be in the world.”
Probable Lineups
Now Thursday has had its own appreciation in another post. I know. You must be miffed at the Thor’s Day, Thunder Clap reference. I couldn’t help myself and was drawn to the sirens of that day’s promise. Do I sound like I’m making excuses?
Trying to keep track of what I actually own now. I didn't realize I'd passed thirty. How did that happen?
Lady C
That being said, here’s the way I see it:
5) The period feel of it was cool for a super hero movie.
The more I learn about Nash the more fascinating a figure he becomes. Born in 1889 he had the kind of Victorian childhood where Mother was seen for an hour in the evening. He read Lewis Carroll and Edward Lear, and from them gained a lifelong love of nonsense and wordplay, and though occasionally ill was robust enough to star in his school soccer team. Any sensible career path was cut off for him by his hopeless maths, yet critics later described his paintings as 'mathematical'. He seems to have been motivated by an intense inner vision, but took centre stage in the public debates of the time.
More good lesson material in this one. Again and again and again, it's all about values! And colors too, but the value shifts are what I'm learning about most. The figure here was quite difficult to bring together because the darkest dark and the lightest light were so close on the value scale, and it took me a while to figure that out. It's an example of painting what you see; not what you think you see, or what you think you have to paint in order to create a good representation of whatever it is you're painting.
The problem for Bob is the context that he left off after the ellipses makes his application of this passage to the earth's place in the universe untenable. Let's have the whole passage, including what he omitted:
All of the sudden
we're kicking off our Girl Land Blog Hop!
Photograph of Mike Jung taken by Michelle Krell Kydd. Other photos in this post are licensed via Creative Commons. The picture of a sauerkraut barrel was taken by Aaron Tyo-Dickerson.
In response to a question about the order from KQED’s Scott Shafer, the governor’s office sent a one-sentence reply: “My administration is working to ensure that California’s laws on capital punishment are upheld and carried out in conformity with our statutes.”
KZN SA Transport and Allied Workers' Union (Satawu) general secretary Joseph Dube denied the incident was related to the strike. "It's not the first time that people have thrown stones at motorists on the freeway." He added that Satawu held a'peaceful march in Durban' on Wednesday.
Last summer, we enjoyed our inflated-ring swimming pool. We did have a few problems with it after one of the cats fell in and used it’s claws on the ring to get out. We never did find all the holes.
"Take a look."
Fire and ice.Blood and gold.Mercy and treason.Oh,how closely are ironies bound to the facets of life ! The hardest thing you have to do turns out to be the best thing you ever did.I loved and cared for Bhartii more than any friend could ever do,but you know a bitch when you see one.Our hearts are those wretched little monsters,turning the very definition of love into a nasty oxymoron.The truth is i loved Aham more.I always did.But when i knew Bhartii was going out with him,i checked myself from turning into one of those jealousy-driven,backbiting friends i had always despised.I knew i had to.Why,if it was the other way around,Bhratii would have done the same and that’s something i am sure of more than myself.It was meant to be that way.But then i got to know that things could never work out between her and Aham and my feelings for him were back to where they truly belonged.It was the least i could do for Bhartii.And for Aham.It was mercy.Yes,it was mercy.And trust.And the million little things friendship is.
You have the ability to not only your Abeona guide Skyrim quickly going to learn how to raise the level of 100, also the most comprehensive ever developed Skyrim practice guide to access. Learn the basics of playing the Skyrim, all main quests and side-quests to get a full practice on improving skills and knowledge of the nature of the game, and all.
2020.E-IX/30/1970. On the folly of American aid to the Greek Colonels. International Herald-Tribune, Paris, France, September 30, 1970; Chicago Daily News, October 6, 1970, p. 6; The Guardian, London, England, October 7, 1970; Manchester Guardian Weekly, October 17, 1970, p. 2.
Happy party time.
Cholesterol is not the enemy, but your choices can be. Yes, you need to watch your intake, but cholesterol does serve a purpose in your body. If you are young, healthy, don’t have a history of cholesterol, work out regularly, stick to a healthy diet, and don’t have a family history of hypercholesterolemia, atherosclerosis , or heart disease you don’t have to be obsessive over whether to have one egg yolk or two. As always, everything is okay in moderation.
Bomboniere (favors)
that were affixed to hotel signs and elsewhere along the way.
Tea can also be applied to savoury applications. It can be used to smoke meats, as in the case of Szechuan tea smoked duck, stocks, braising or poaching liquid, or cream sauce, especially with smoky lapsang souchong. The Tibetans has a drink called butter tea which is made with yak butter while the Burmese makes a fermented tea leaves dish called laphet. The possibilities are quite endless.
When we were young, my mom would get out doilies, lace,
But back to the topic.^^
d) Funds Congress, which--after Enron and the Banks and the Media and deadbeat dads and students taking tests and prominent evangelical leaders who like to pay men to spend extra time with them and any group involved in any way with the city of New Orleans--is one of the most dishonest and corrupt institutions in our country.
laser pulsed (flash) weapon fired from the missing
And leave me feeling vexed).
Do you?
You don't have a clear focus, you're not really sure what's true for you. Now there's only one way to change all that. You have to change your thought about it.
When the beans have cooked, I then season it with sea salt and white pepper and add in the chopped celery leaves.
It was then like a scene from a movie – while they were rounding people into my room, I called my husband and we both knew he’d never make it. They made one attempt at an IV in my room and my OB finally said something along the lines of “we don’t have time for this – she’s got to go NOW”. I was then flying through the hallways – I was so scared that I was physically trembling. I went right into the OR and there wasn’t even time to give me a spinal so I was put under general anesthesia and that’s the last I remember before waking up in excruciating pain in recovery.
The past two months I had put together a series called “The Arrivals” and one of the first few videos dealt with the subject of critical thinking. It emphasized the importance of learning how to form your own opinions. Living in a world where the media presents anything it wants whether it’s genuine or not, the problem with deciding what we personally think seems to be either discouraged or simply not accepted. It is almost as if there is actually something wrong with you thinking for yourself! You often hear things like, “People are entitled to their own opinions”or sometimes, “Your opinion doesn’t matter.”Both are often mentioned with negative intentions, connotations and implications.
In this 400th anniversary of the publication of the KJV why don't you read through the whole Bible? If you read just 4 chapters a day, it will get you through the whole Bible in a calendar year. To know the God of the Word we need to study the Word of God. We have the whole KJV Bible available on audio MP3 which is ideal to play while commuting by car.
Next we had a pint each of the excellent Summer Wine Brewery Gambit Golden Ale. A bit of a misnomer this, its only very slightly less pale than other 4 or 5% SWB beers and for all its claimed colour differences tastes very similar to their Zenith Pale ale. Not that this is a bad thing - lots of hops to quench the thirst plus some extra ones to tingle the tastebuds and the tongue, a very enjoyable pale beer.
That's it for me today. Hopefully I'll have some more to post when I get home in a few days.
Where did we go wrong
In the beginning God created the heaven and the earth. And the earth was without form, and void; and darkness was upon the face of the deep. And the Spirit of God moved upon the face of the waters. (Gen 1:1-2 KJV)
6 boneless, skinless chicken breasts, cubed
Things I wish I had thought of myself:
Cardstock is from the Papermill
This dream was constant many years back and came as a flash and got overlapped with a new one. Even in my subconscious mind I recognized it . Something took control and transported me to another time.
I don't think I could pick just ten if my life depended on it so I'm not going to think about this one too hard and I'm going to note that I'll probably miss a lot of my favorites too. So in no particular order, here is a representation of some of my favorite characters.
Here are four of my favorite episodes.
These last three days have been so unbelievably busy, and I have not been home much beyond basic farm chores and errands. Just 5 hours ago I was walking back to Brett's truck 2 miles from the Canadian Border at an Amish Harness shop as locals ran by in buggies and waved. Just minutes ago I lured and re-caught 13 escaped sheep who I first found out had escaped while eating a burger in Lake Placid. And just seconds ago I realized how tired I am and yet how much I want to write.
Ithaca Beer Company Brute
Now for the rest of the petals...
Most people think that the income tax is on ALL income you receive from whatever source. That is not correct! The confusion arises from the wrong interpretation of the 16th Amendment (1913). Let’s look at it again. It says:
Tolls are bad for families and businesses. Our organization exists to educate the public about the issue of tolling; we are not advocates for alternative financial options, although we believe there are many. We are also not opposed to bridges that are built within the financial means of our regional economy provided they do not require tolls on existing structures. We assert that there are plenty of other options to tolls that must be pursued, or an affordable alternative to the plan so that tolls are not necessary. In other words, we are not opposed to new bridge(s).
A woman has just told STV that she is married to a penguin and there is not a peep, no sensationalist headline, no exclusive photo.
As athletes this is our life and as such it is raw, real and intense. This can have both positive and negative impact on performance. I certainly know once I got injured in 2000 and it being a games year it weighed heavily on my mind. Tonight I sit in this cabin with Josh and we are passing the time and effectively waiting for our next chance to race. I think as I sit here that within a couple of hundred meters in any direction from our cabin are the whole squad of Australia athletes waiting too. I can only imagine the range of emotions, the levels of relaxation and anxiousness that maybe rising and failing all around us. Sure tonight's not the worst. Prior to each race the levels hit there peaks. We are all elite athletes with various degrees of experience and certainly I see the purpose prior to each race yet the slight tension and dynamic flow of energy is quiet extraordinary. The thing is this is a quiet event. So these emotions only get magnified as the stakes go up. Having medals and Olympics ones for that matter on offer change the dynamic. We are still athletes waiting and getting ready but things shift. Having been through all this countless times I remind myself to be alert, to be ready, to imagine a bigger moment all the while staying composed and calm. The capacity to get the best out of myself and our crew and to balance performance standards we drive with what the future hold with competition for World class athletes for other Countries.
10 Second Honeymoon
Printer-Friendly Version
My second boomerang beer was the two year old Cantillon. It was lovely. Sharp, sour but above all beautifully balanced and very smooth. Another Lambic also floated my beer boat this year. It was Revelation Cat's three year old Lambic that had been aged in a Laphraoig whisky cask. An oak aged Lambic! A strange concept but one that worked for me.
# Malic acid also helps the liver to detoxify.
She did such an incredible job with the photos the first time around! I was excited to have her take my photos again, this time in my living, breathing, working, art studio... not my little ole basement. When I saw the proofs I was amazed! She captured images that were professional, pretty, bright, colorful, and I just can't tell you how much I love them!!
“Can I talk to Dr. Borden?”
Only nine of the firefighters have a professional aviation qualification and are experienced in this field. Most of the nine have worked at the airport for more than 20 years.
♥ Pass the award onto 6 Bloggers you consider to be creative.
Our weekend adventures began on Friday at Old South Pancake House! Love that place! Nothing beats a yummy German pancake soaked in lemon and butter!! We ate, chatted & enjoyed getting to know each other!
The door was supposed to be in a little over two months ago. It came late, and it came with all sorts of mistakes. The hardware wasn't the oil rubbed bronze, the door was flat instead of having an arch paneling, it wasn't double bore holed (holed for two entry way handles), and it opened on the wrong side (we switched the configuration to open on the right side instead of the left). All of which we didn't realize until we got home with this big huge heavy door and managed to get it in our garage.
In late June, I started working with a show promoter in Knoxville, Tennessee. He was promoting a show where my family's juggling act was going to be performing in July. I made some spending money helping to sell tickets and advertising for this show.
The programme, which was launched by Deputy Prime Minister and Education Minister Tan Sri Muhyiddin Yassin yesterday at Sri Aman Girls Secondary School, is slated to be an annual affair.
I’m happy to know you.
Julius Nyerere - President of Tanzania,
Paper: Hopscotch by Creative Memories
Further, if you’d like to see a slideshow of pictures of Haikufest, please log onto William Shehan’s blog, www.fiercebuddhist.wordpress.com
“That Christ died for our sins in accordance with the scriptures, and that he was buried, and that he was raised on the third day in accordance with the scriptures, and that he appeared to Cephas, then to the twelve.” (1 Cor 15:3b-5)
Our collective generational boner for utility goes a long way to explaining our cultural fascination with camouflage. Granted the use of military
"Thought to have been 'discovered' by Emperor Shen-nung in 2737 BC!"
Even when the subsequent economic contributions of hot prospects seem to validate their worth on paper, aggressive lateral hiring erodes partnership values. The prevailing business model has no metric for collegiality, a shared sense of purpose, or the willingness to weather tough times. How badly frayed have partnership bonds become when, as at Dewey, some partners ask a district attorney to prosecute the firm’s most recent chairman? That’s the definition of bottoming-out.
The end of the year is closing in on us quickly.
So, I've come across some genius ideas here lately and felt an urge to make and share them. Anything that makes life simpler I am all on board for. Over the next couple weeks I'll add some other homemade mixes I've tried also, all of these have made making supper or any meal a much easier task. I actually enjoy prepping and making food now that I have all these cheats!
36) I was date raped when I was 13, and that's how I lost my virginity. I don't recommend it, even as a conversation piece.
As something comes within our grasp
I mean…as an Econ major aspired to be a filmmaker, I will admit those majors are useless in terms of earning money or living a good quality of life
Thank you Jennifer for taking the time to let me know I am not forgotten and that Resolana is and will always be a huge part of my recovery.
Other notes:Anyone else really f*cking hate downward-facing-dog pose? Dude. Kill your wrists much? Yowch. Maybe this gets better as your arm muscles develop or something.
We need to learn to trust in God and remain in constant communication with Him so that we know that we are not alone in our situation.
this aching from the start
At sunrise on December 21, 2012 for the first time in 26,000 years the Sun rises to conjunct the intersection of the Milky Way and the plane of the ecliptic. This cosmic cross is considered to be an embodiment of the Sacred Tree, The Tree of Life, a tree remembered in all the world’s spiritual traditions.
It must be the same for you and me. If you put your faith in the work of Jesus Christ on the cross for your personal salvation, you should have the confidence that He lives in you. If that is true, you are able to claim everything else – His love, His power, and His care for you.
I long to be Mario;
I remember that car journey well. Not so much the sights but more the scents: my mother's lipstick, leather jacket, chewing gum and whiskey. In a way it seemed perfect for what was passing us by outside - like a smell track to a film. Driving through central London's early evening bustle seemed almost unreal, like a magic world that only existed in books or dreams. It was exciting and beautiful, but somewhere I felt, even knew, it was probably the worst possible place my mother could ever be.
This is a post about something I’d never thought of until my master brought it up with me yesterday. Remember yesterday? It was Josh Groban Day on my blog. Hence, it was also the day I had to account for my actions. “What on earth drove you to do that?!” asked my master.
Squishy hugs to all love Vicky xoxoxoxoxo
Here's the buzz.....The CMIT?CEM Design Team (Creating memories In Time/Creating Everlasting Memories) will create ATC Trading Cards and publish them on the CMIT Blog (http://cmitonlineblog.blogspot.com/) for everyone to see, we will provide instructions, and material list to duplicate the created ATC's. We encourage you, our viewers, to play along. All you need to do is send us your very own ATC creation. Our design team will choose a winner, and a NICE prize will be sent to the "creative" person for each months competition. The first ATC Tuesday will be October 12th, email all submissions to stampnterre@cox.net. Please provide your name, blog information (if you have one), and email address.
Group 2 – Tapped Jan. 1st
You have defended your decision to compromise this program by asserting that “terror financiers know” our methods for tracking their funds and have already moved to other methods to send money. The fact that your editors believe themselves to be qualified to assess how terrorists are moving money betrays a breathtaking arrogance and a deep misunderstanding of this program and how it works. While terrorists are relying more heavily than before on cumbersome methods to move money, such as cash couriers, we have continued to see them using the formal financial system, which has made this particular program incredibly valuable.
Someone at the nursing home had given Poppop a handmade crochet blanket. It laid on his bed and he used it to keep warm on many occasions. That blanket was over him the day he passed away. The next morning when we went to the Funeral Home they gave me the blanket. I hugged it all the way home and for a long time afterwards. Now that blanket is in my bedroom.
By and large, one should not judge the strength of a series by its premiere episode. With American programs, pilots are generally the first aired, and even if they're "good," they pale in comparison with the rest of the series. This one is no exception. Not to say it's awful, in fact, it's still very watchable - plenty of classic Python bits to be found here - but the moments where the show is off it feels like a cheap skit put on at a talent show.
For some reason my circadian rhythms have changed post-TBI and my brain has ideas all its own about the inconvenient hours it wished to keep. Why I am awake more at night than during any day is beyond me!
My garden runneth over, with zucchini. I've made zucchini bread a few times already, and while we all like zucchini bread a lot, we are getting a little tired of the same ol' same ol'. Mr. Boom and Chirp-chirp refuse to eat fried zucchini, no matter how much Parmesan cheese is melted over the top, so I'm trying to find new ways to use up the squash.
11th August 2009
Over the past few years, the science department here at Ad Contrarian World Heaqdquarters has tried to counterbalance the intemperate ravings of pundit/lunatics by introducing some facts and perspective into the discussion.
My attention has flown lock, stock and barrel to Pinterest! Wonderful recipes, to say nothing of great craft ideas.
take a kidney out of one person, put it in another, and have him
get my hair done, shave my legs
In case there are still problems accessing the surveys through our site, here are the direct links to the school council surveys:
No Mark, you and your organisation need to lose your charitable status and state-funding. The BBC refers to Alcohol Concern Cymru as 'A health campaign group', they are nothing of the sort, these are the neo-prohibitionists for the twenty-first century. They won't be satisfied until thousands of jobs are lost by the excellent drinks sector we have in Wales.
Your light source should be 2 adjustable lamps with daylight light bulbs, 100watts will get a great result. Daylight light bulbs are best because the colors in your photographs will be more accurate than if you use a regular yellowish bulb. Daylight light bulbs look bluish when they are not on. You can get daylight light bulbs from any good electrical store, some art supply stores also stock them as painters prefer to use them too.
It also motivates me to do something for the more than 27 million others enslaved around the world.
Enjoy it all!
Whether or not you actually believe in that sort of thing, it’s hard to deny the fear that can spring up in us full-grown when it comes to wandering around at night in the dark.
Note to the authors of ebooks: If you want your readers to do something after they’ve read your book then tell them as soon as they’ve finished the book. That’s the beauty of an ebook, you can have a link to Amazon or Smashwords or whatever sitting there and all they have to do is click on it:
4. lonesome: If you are lonesome, you feel lonely and want company.
If you were me what would you do? Would you engage with Betty or leave it at these questions?
We dropped Boo off at my mom's down in St. Augustine and we went to a movie and dinner. We saw The Hunger Games. Totally rocked. Loved that movie. Peeta is HOT. How old is he anyways? Hopefully over 18. I would prefer to not be seen in an innappropriate light--commenting on a minor and all.
May 18 - Leonard Kastle, writer-director ("The Honeymoon Killers"), 82
We are definitely planning a trip to California soon!! It's a little tough for us though....since the trip requires us to travel across the entire country! We have our trip planned for 2012, staying at the new Art of Animation resort, Cars section, of course!! It will be a nice way to gear up for Carsland!! Hopefully we can do that in 2013!
Upon first inspection, the booklet seems to be a how-to instruction containing various information and pictures of what I can only discern as little robot-looking ticks.
The Alter and the Crown.
Furthermore, the faithful are the sheep of Yahweh’s hand, e.g. his people whom he protects, and are supposed to hear his voice:
While many Greek names and words have come in to English with very close meanings to the originals, few have suffered more degradation than that of Narcissus. “Narcissism” is considered one of the greatest forms of pride and hubris, synonymous with vanity, shallowness, egotism, and arrogance, and is even used psychologically for a particular kind of personality disorder. However, the philosophical debate and even mystical dimensions of this myth have been debated since the beginning, and continue even now. Narcissus was born of the nymph Liriope and the river god Cephisus through a watery rape, and was the perfection of youthful male beauty in superlative manner. His mother took him to the blind prophet Tiresias (who had spent time as both a male and a female), and asked him if the boy would live long, to which the sage replied “Only if he never knows himself” (remember the Delphic Maxim, “know thyself”). A man called Ameinias fell in love with Narcissus, and asked him for his love, but Narcissus was quiet (it was considered good etiquette to refuse several times before accepting the advances of any lover if you were a boy) and instead sent him a sharpened dagger with a slave. As he killed himself, Ameinias cursed the boy to be consumed by love but denied the one he craved, and Artemis heard this plea. Meanwhile, the nymph Echo also fell in love with him, but bereft of voice, pined away quietly until she died. Her fellow nymphs also caressed the boy in vain, and one slighted virgin amongst them prayed that “may he love like me, and love like me in vain,” which the goddess Rhamnusia heard with favor. While hunting (within the sphere of influence of Artemis), Narcissus happened to look upon his own reflection in a pool, with the hair of Apollon and the fine form of Dionysos, and was smitten with love. He poured out words of affection (which, by Echo, were repeated back to him), but could never get close enough to embrace his love, and he either took his own life with his sword (mirroring Ameinias’ suicide), or withered away in longing until death, or attempting to embrace his love, he drowned. Nymphs sought to bury him, but instead his body became a flower, the downward-pointing narcissus; and in the netherworld, it is said that his shade would perpetually look upon its own reflection in the River Styx. Ovid and Pausanias relate the story of Narcissus. He is further linked with Narcissus oil, an intoxicating substance (as the cupbearers of nectar, Ganymede and Pelops, and Ampelos and Dionysus, the spirits of the vine), and the Greek root narke (numbness/deadness) is part of his name, which is also found in the word “narcotic.”
I always knew that there was going to be consistency in what I was getting at school and what I was getting at home. My dad always said that if I got a whipping at school that I could expect one when I got home. Sounds tough, but it was true. Now we have parents suing schools for disciplining kids and then complaining when the kids don’t learn anything. And the last thing that your kids will hear in school these days is that God created the universe, much less the story of David and Goliath. Instead they are taught new stories about families with 2 mommies or 2 daddies and when they get to middle school they are taught how to use condoms and where to go if you need an abortion.
So when Roth left (in a very acrimonious break-up), many understandably assumed that was the end of the band. Historically, the simple fact is that many rock bands are most identified by the general public through their lead singers, not who writes all the songs or plays the guitar. And the bigger the band, the more daunting the task of replacing the singer. Very few mega-selling bands in rock history have been able to replace their high-profile lead singers in mid-career and continue the same level of success. One could argue that AC/DC, who were forced to replace the recently deceased Bon Scott with Brian Johnson, are one of the few exceptions. But even they weren't a household name at the time.
Can't Go to Heaven by The Dirt Daubers
I only recall one of his specials from the early-to-mid 1990s, on feminists’ campus date rape hoax. White feminists were screaming “No means no!” So, Stossel interviews a group of 10 or so college-age black girls, and asks them about “No means no!” Well, every single one of them denies it! They all agree that “‘No’ doesn’t necessarily mean no.” They said that a good girl will say “No,” not because she doesn’t want to have sex. She wants it, but she doesn’t want to look like a slut for saying, “Yes.”
And the fripperies could well be counterproductive. The much touted national disability insurance scheme will undoubtedly even up disability support for people -- but in the usual way of these things, the support will be levelled downwards, not levelled up.
- Pens
13. Giant
Well April shot by and my 5722 mile 3 1/2 week east coast teaching tour was excellent. I had a blast with my friend Gail Moore at Bead Fest Spring, I had way to many laughs in South Carolina with Heidi at the Beaded Frog and my time in Cleveland with the Northeast Ohio Metal Clay Guild and my friend Gail Lannum was way to much fun and way to short.
However, the AG’s opinion was that the scope of protection of the Directive does not cover the creation of the data itself but just its collection, verification, and presentation, distinguishing between the time when the data were created (which the Directive does not concern) and the time when it was collected or developed (which it does concern and is relevant for the purposes of determining whether the database is eligible for protection).
Last year I was asked by The Stewartry Camera Club to give a talk to their members about Portrait Photography. It seemed to go down well and I was asked back this year to talk about self-portraits and to set a competition, which I did on Wednesday.
4 frames £32 8 frames £64
Nothing says I love you better than flowers. The colours, the smell , just the sheer beauty of flowers, make you smile and brightens up your day. I love flowers, but they can be pricey . Here are some tips to make your money and your flowers go a long way. So when you get a flowers for this Mother’s Day, or for your anniversary/Birthday or flowers from your own garden, here are some tips to add life to them.
"And on that day when my strength is failing
I had a ton of pictures taken there and still have not sorted them. I am so much behind in post processing. One thing I noticed, the point and shoot camera captures better colours while the DSLR scores much higher in details.
The strictly unofficial Red Bridge Autumn Ceremony takes place near the Red Bridge itself and involves flowers and the reading of the classical poem to celebrate the Slender West Lake. Both P and I had been put to translating it - only four lines, but heavily rhymed, with seven characters per line, which could be translated as seven stresses in English terms. The poem was read, and P and I read our translations while clutching little bouquets of grass. Two beautifully dressed, beautiful girls performed a lotus petals ceremony. People sang, then off we went on a boat trip to another garden and another mansion, a special guided tour with more zither music on the boat. We cruise along the Slender West Lake past banks of bamboo, past willows, past little islands and moor at another formal garden built by another rich businessman. Rich businessmen seem to have built everything. A beautiful girl gives us a beautiful tour that ends up in a high pavilion overlooking the lake while more beautiful girls in even more beautiful costumes play flutes and lutes and zithers.
Que Sera, Sera - Dave Alvin And The Guilty Women (Doris Day W’56)
--a hint of His 'new day'.
Describing On The Impossible Past is just a punk record would not do it justice. While it does punk very, very well—the driving riffs, sing-along choruses, and passionately screamed vocals are all there—the album is also tinged with heavy doses of folk and Americana. Tom May’s vocals vividly paint nostalgic narratives full of muscle cars, diner waitresses and drunken teenage mistakes. The Menzingers have crafted an excellent folk-punk record with a whole lot of heart, and it would be a crime not to give it a shot.
This is a Peek a Boo sack from Make it Perfect - the peek a boo window is supposed to be at the bottom so the contents show - don't ask me what I was thinking when I started the final assembly and got things upside down! Hopefully the 4 year old recipient won't notice :D
This morning at about 9 AM, one of our doctors walked in and announced that buses would be leaving at 10 AM for an award ceremony which most of us didn’t know about. After the last lecture ended, everyone who wanted to go (there were people who didn’t go…their loss) rushed into the bathroom to check themselves.
Min 30: “People are saying nice things in the comments. The stats look good. Okay, okay. I’ll write something tomorrow, but only because you begged. Sorry. Sorry. I begged. I’m grateful. So, grateful. Thank you. Thank you for reading. I haven’t felt this good since Eisenhower was elected. God, now I’ve got to go and do something else!”
I’m going to be working on side projects, like audio books, and enhanced ebooks, and trailers, that will perhaps draw different kinds of attention to the greater project (the series).
I am not saying they should have to remove them during their stay here, (although I'd like a debate on that) but at least to enter the country!
15 Please Let Me Wonder
Missing the ice cream treat is upsetting. We have a preschool class in our building that is half day so they don't visit the cafeteria much. We had some leftover ice cream cups we gave them for snack. They came down in a very cute row to thank us. One little boy burst into tears 'cause he was absent. I totally understand...I would have cried too. Good news...the teachers saved his snack and all was well.
And please always remember that I bought you shoes because I love you. Because I need to believe that someday this will be over. Because I need to believe that someday you will wear them when you walk off that plane with your Daddy and in to our home and you will stay forever.
I bought a small set of copic markers on the weekend. I have to say…I’m completely and utterly in love. They’re like markers, watercolors, and pure awesomeness all rolled into one little pricey marker. At $8 per marker, I’ve eyeballed them for so long, but have never been able to justify the price. I found a set of 44 used markers online though, and the price was amazing, so I bought them. Here’s a quick doodle of my first time using them. I did it while sitting on the ground waiting for the train to come. It’s on the back of the receipt for the markers. Then I continued it while I ate Wendy’s with Jamie, then finished it while he bought lego at Toys R Us. Did I mention I’m in love? I can hardly put them down!!
Falling towers
Ladies, as a woman of a certain age (of course you don’t need to know what that is…I mean really), I have come to the realization that as women we tend to enter into relationships with these preconceived notions of how we expect men to be. We ourselves expect to be treated a certain way, as we should. We expect him to look a certain way, have a certain pay, and smell better than anything walking on two legs. We pray that his kiss will knock us off our feet and that what will be between his legs will not only be good but will work to fulfill our every desire.
In 1917, Stan met (and fell for) a woman named Mae Dahlberg, an Australian woman who was part of a dancing sister act. Stan dumped the Cookes and teamed up with Mae, making her both his comedy partner and common-law wife. (the fact that she had an actual husband down under stopped her from becoming the legal Mrs. Jefferson). It was Mae who gave Stan the surname the public came to know him by. With the high degree of superstition so common to stage folk, Stanley realized one day that “Jefferson” has 13 letters. Of course, that numerological handicap never hindered Joseph or Thomas J., but we’ll let that pass. As the two were casting about for names one day, Mae cracked open a history book and saw a picture of Scipio Africanus wearing the traditional laurel wreath of a victorious roman general. And, so, that’s why we call him Stan Africanus. No, no, just kidding.
Pages: 172
Where once was light
At some point, they grabbed my phone and wouldn't give it back. I was eager to know what was going on in the little world of my phone, so I kept asking for it back. But they decided that I wouldn't get it back until we ended up at a new undisclosed location.
With over 2 billion viewers the World Cup is also the world’s biggest live televised event. It dwarfs any event previously hosted in South Africa. The fact that every global news and press agency will converge on South Africa will greatly magnify the impact of any attack. Such global news coverage is a further factor that would make a terror attack on the World Cup a very attractive proposition for Al Qaeda.
That was fun to write.
One of the many reasons that I love what I do is because I am constantly surrounded by talented professionals in the wedding industry, and I am so blessed to be able to collaborate with them and call them as friends. These 3 ladies are truly inspirational, and I have to say that they are all on the top of their field. I know that we are going to be friends for a long, long time.
· Henry Hadaway
This cute little Scotty wanted to play with a group of children coming out of the toy store. Just after I passed the children convinced the little Scotty's master to let him visit a bit. As for me, I had gotten most of the shots I had gone after so it was time for me to head home.
Lifes battles don’t always go
Listened to the melody and words so often and here Willem sat, holding it, hugging it.
Another tulip. It's finally warming up here, and it starting to feel like spring. Still very rainy too. I don't care, I'll take it. The cold weather really drags you down after...oh I dunno....5 or 6 months.
I spent a lot of time sighing and wondering how much use these skills would be when the world finally falls into apocalyptic chaos.
To write vs Deleting this blog?
Larry Clark’s Tulsa follows the lives of him and his friends from 1963 to 1971. These photographs document their drugs abuse, sexual encounters and violence in his home town. The opening of his book contains this quote from Clark, “I was born in Tulsa Oklahoma in 1943. When I was sixteen I started shooting amphetamine. I shot with my friends everyday for three years and then left town but I’ve gone back through the years. Once the needle goes in it never comes out”. Tulsa is a piece of Clark’s life, he didn’t set out to photograph others behaving this way but he was part of it.
Even small rooms like a bathroom could use some "live"-ening up!
Today, it’s Toronto’s bike sharing service first anniversary: since May 2011, the city has 1000 bikes in 80 stations throughout downtown. During the hole day, people will see special events at different BIXI Toronto stations.
and how I could have missed it. I am now a devoted fan of Martin Clunes.
Method: Preheat the oven to 350 F/ 180C and line an 8 inch square baking tin.
Cally please mail me for your prize and thank you for the suggestion :)
Flashback:
Hers is the face that rubs against your pulse, hers the tongue that laps at your tears.
*i love my note
An this being Burns Night it has to be haggis, but what to pair it with???
An entirely separate set of positive contacts occurred in Italy, and were the subject of the TV documentary “The Friendship Case”, in which key firsthand witnesses broke their silence and spoke about the events they experienced.
Here is what is known to have happened: Smith was first married in 1827, and over the next three years he set about dictating the Book of Mormon, which was published in 1830, when the church was officially founded. Years later there was a scandal concerning a maid who had worked in his home.
Twelve miles is a long time to just take in the scenery! As beautiful as it was, I needed to entertain myself! ;)
Up to that point, Mr. Potok had been preaching to the choir. The professor who introduced the Maestro gushingly referred to him as her “personal hero,” and the crowd of wide-eyed twenty-somethings had been nodding and “Amen”-ing their way throughout the lecture.
George Harrison- Early Takes Vol. 1 and Living in the Material World (two releases in one week is pretty impressive, especially for a dead guy)
Mum fell in love with a 'Time Out' doll that was in the cottage we rented during the summer holidays. If anyone sells them here in the UK, I couldn't find them, so I sent off to the US for a pattern and had fun making 'Lottie'. It was even more fun searching for clothes in all the charity shops. Everything but the stuffing was recycled - I even found (unused, still packaged) hair pieces in the charity shops, which pleased me so much.
Bridgid's has a very "everyone knows your name" feel to it, and I'm not just saying that because I knew a few people in the room. Their tap list is great; I had a Dogfish Head Palo Santo. Their bottle list is also stellar, with some great seasonal rotating offerings.
We started with Harvest Dance, one of Boulevard’s seasonal Smokestack series beers. It’s a wheat wine, and it went nicely with the roasted butternut squash, pumpkin walnut bread, and Basque cheese.
As I recounted over at Muscato's place, one of my earliest musical treats was discovering my grandparent's surviving 78rpm records, among which were such gems as Les Compagnons de la Chanson Trois Cloches and Alice Faye's Alexander's Ragtime Band. I adored her voice, even as a small child. And here is the original...
In two weeks, the cousins will get together to celebrate his life, share stories and open a bottle of three of wine to toast him - one Celebration of Life in Calgary and another in Toronto - with pictures and memories shared between the two to celebrate him and the impact he's had on us all.
Ahhh. This is the part harder for me to write. Does Robbie mean anything to me? Well, no. Do I see him in a way similar to Liam? No. Like Keith? Perhaps but in a different way. Let me try to explain.
But you are.
It’s interesting to note where the yellows and oranges on the leaves like on the photo come from. According to sciencemadesimple.com, insufficient water and light for photosynthesis during winter when the trees rest and live off the food they stored during summer cause the leaves on the photo to turn into yellow, orange, and even red. The trees begin to shut down their food-making factories. The green chlorophyll disappears from the leaves and as the bright green fades away, the yellow and orange colors begin to surface. Small amounts of these colors have been in the leaves all along but it’s not visible during summer because they are covered up by the green chlorophyll. Sunlight and the cool nights of autumn cause the leaves to turn this glucose into these beautiful colors. The brown color of trees like oaks is made from wastes left in the leaves. It is the combination of all these things that make the beautiful fall foliage colors.
Living in Charlotte is pretty dang wonderful, if I do say so myself. There is never a shortage of fun, interesting, and exciting adventures to explore. If you've never been to our "Queen City," let me give you a little tour of the place I am so proud to call home.
The first ‘chapter’ is called the Prologue (which means it isn’t actually a ‘chapter’ but whatever). It takes place back in the day when Stormwind had just finished being rebuilt (which I say happened in Year 20. Nothing seems to be entirely clear on that). Creme is a young girl, around 5 or so, and her mother, Elise, is taking her to Stormwind to the planned celebration/collection of payment for the workers (Elise is collecting her late-husband’s wages). However, things end up badly when the workers learn there is no payment and riots begin. Elise is killed in these riots, leading off to a very depressing start.
or sitting with a baby hanging from her breast.
You can Belly dance to our Live DJ Jen Noel at Savage Garden Parvana Rya club or swing your hips with DJ Bob Petersen at Savage Garden Tale of the Whale Ballroom. If you love the oldies like Frank Sinatra, Dean Martin and the best of the Rat Pack then the “Whale” is where you want to be. Throughout the sim you will hear the sounds of nature, birds, wildlife and slow romance. Dancing is everywhere on the sim, you can use our Intans or poseballs, the choice is up to you. Watch out for the Pirates that occupy the Pirate ships. Swing in the trees while watching cascading waterfalls. If you love to explore then you will want to make sure you have plenty of time to venture into the castle as there are many hidden rooms, hallways and if your lucky enough to find the hidden passages that go deep within the floors of the medieval castle, you will find endless underground caves with fun interactive poseballs. You will be at the heart of the caves when you see the beautiful waterfall spilling into a flower surrounded pond, and yes you can even swim there.
It is like going to hairdresser for a haircut and coming away with advice on how to style your new hair and no cut.
A mayoral decree of the 15th of February 1925 announced that work on the third and final section of Gran Via would begin the next day. This would be known as the “Avenida Eduardo Dato”. Two years later the work had progressed as far as the Calle San Bernardo with demolitions and the reconstruction for the final section down to the Plaza España taking place from 1927 to 1929.
It was 63* outside at 8:30 this morning! On the last day of February! Crazy Leap Day weather. . .
Did you know your name is special? Daddy and I didn't just pick any old name for you. No no, we talked long and hard to find just the perfect fit. Your name, Bethany, is Hebrew and it means House of God. Daddy and I pray every day that you will accept Jesus as your Savior very soon. Did you know you have a special bible verse too? Matthew 5:8 is the one we picked just for you - "Blessed are the pure in heart for they shall see God".
Flowers you can eat! Easily amused, I giggled over the concept and placed the fragile packet on top of my other purchases, the Queens of the panier. I found it indescribably reassuring that the stems were still caked with dirt from his garden and the interiors dotted with the remains of morning dew. Stray petals clung equally tenaciously inside the basket of ruby red strawberries.
Fortunately, some of the little craft breweries in Oregon continue to stretch the definition of craft beer by reintroducing and reinterpreting some very old beer styles. After all, given the highly evolved state of American craft brewing, what's left to be discovered?
I will show you some of the photos....
Police reported several arrests after clashes between police and demonstrators with offenses including vandalism and striking an officer.
One big problem — the only problem — was that the volume was too loud for the venue. I’m not griping about volume. But the venue really couldn’t handle that much sound. We had seats up in the balcony and when we were up there, things were a bit crackly.
I'm well known for my breakfast tacos but the other morning I didn't have tortillas, cream cheese or even refried beans so I was stuck with a six pack of Portuguese sweet bread buns I had purchased at a Somerville bodega, a pound of pork, and a pint of French onion dip.
1/2 - 1/4 - 1/8 - 1/15 - 1/30 - 1/60 - 1/125 - 1/250 - 1/500 - 1/1000 - 1/2000 - 1/4000 - 1/8000
When they started school everyone was worried they might be in different classes, but no, they were even put in the same class – together!
ODIs- 102, Wickets- 142, Avg- 21.36, 4W- 6, Best- 5/26
Bali maharaj got the mercy of vamana dev’s only one leg on his head an incarnation of Vishnu but on kaliyas head Krsna the supreme himself danced and made several impressions of his leg on his several hoods. Such is the Standard of Krsnas Character.
Darling Belle is sweet southern-belle-turned-big-city-girl.
See you all next time !!!
- Flower punch (flower centers - water distressed)
If you have any questions...let me know!! I use these all year long. I am constantly referring back to them. I will be creating tons...oh, and I do mean TONS of things that coordinate with this packet!!
It was a pleasure to finally be able to translate this song, the original video doesn’t contains the lyrics so I decided to make a new one, at the beginning I was going to do a slideshow but due to the several effects and video layers I had to use it was simply not possible, also the original picture has a typo, so I had to edit it with my own title and add bump mapping to make up for the low resolution.
They soon came over to where I was sitting in the grass, watching the girls play and have fun in the water. CBG was irritated, Ankle Biter was shivering. He looked at me with big brown eyes, as CBG was making his irritation known.
As Christians we need to “get into” the Word of God – and make sure the Word of God is “getting into us.” We are to surrender our bodies and be transformed by the renewing of our minds. We are not to be conformed to the world. When we are applying these principles, we will exercise our spiritual gifts in our everyday lives, in our relationships with our brothers and sisters, and even with our enemies. That’s the pattern for “proving” the good, acceptable, and perfect will of God.
I don't think it's a coincidence that faux-Whites are often semi-jews. They exhibit a deep psychological conflict, craving for whatever reason to be seen as White, or more accurately "white", while deprecating Whiteness. They echo neo-liberal anti-White guilt-tripping even as they strike a pose against it. They tend to ignore, distract from, or dissemble about jewish exclusion/particularism/discrimination/supremacism and anti-White culpability.
Barca made a single change in 2010, selling unhappy Swedish striker Zlatan Ibrahimovic (who had replaced Eto’o after the 2008 season) and bringing in Spanish star David Villa to replace him alongside Messi. They also sold Henry, who was unhappy about his lack of playing time. However, there were doubts about how the moves would work out for Barca. With Eto’o and Ibrahimovic, Barca had bigger bodied strikers who played close to the goal and focused on putting the ball in the net. They were an ideal complement to Messi, a playmaking wizard who liked to play a little further from the net to give him space for his dynamic, penetrating runs. With Villa, they had another smaller, quick playmaking striker. While not of the caliber of Messi (who is without doubt the world’s greatest player) he is still a top five striker.
The Individual or the group?
“Now there was a man of the Pharisees, named Nicodemus, a ruler of the Jews; this man came to Jesus by night and said to Him, ‘Rabbi, we know that You have come from God as a teacher; for no one can do these signs that You do unless God is with him.’” John 3:1,2
DC Brau and Epic, have both been honored with
I wouldn't say it doesn't feel like a Friday, but I'd swear it feels like a Thursday. At the very least, a Wednesday. But the calendar tells me it's only Monday, and Blogger tells me it's been many moons since I was last around here. I've got a quiet night so it's about high time I caught up.
There is divinity in the hungry tiger and the fleeing deer. Sometimes the deer lives, sometimes the tiger eats.
With that in mind – I made the following. Give a hoot if you like it.
~It's even better quality than I expected. I thought the pages would be thin, like a sheet, but they're puffy and thick, and fabulous.
my picture with her so she won't forget me.' 'I
Wash the arugula and peel the potato. Chop the shallot and celery branches thinly.
Rating: (4) (4)
Fortunately, my Muse knows this and steers my path into other directions. Basically meaning that the ideas I’ve started with have consistently morphed into something else. I’ve also discovered how difficult it is to keep short stories short. William found several magazines who want stories between 3 and 6K, and a few more that want them up to 8k. I’m averaging 4+ to just over 6k.
The CIA and Mossad do not really suspect that Iran has nuclear capabilities yet. However, the current U.S. policy towards Iran is forcing them to pursue nuclear capabilities in order to gain a deterrent against a U.S/Israeli invasion. While the Iranian regime is illegitimate and certainly involved in human rights abuses, it is also illegitimate for the U.S. to engage in collective punishment of the Iranian people.
If you're not sure where to register, make a list of stores that you like and go visit them. Think about what you need and want for your home and pick the store or stores that offer those items.
Everything was AWESOME and the
You could tell just by looking at him that the character of Koukou was added to the cast strictly to provide comic relief. And while I generally agree with this assessment, to be honest, I was way too busy admiring Analía Ivars' first-rate side-boobage to notice if he was being funny or not. If Koukou sad that I was unable to notice if Koukou was being funny or not. I'm sorry, Koukou. But Koukou will just have to except the fact Analía's boobies will always trump Koukou's comedic prowess whenever Analía's boobies are the focal point any scene involving Liana and Koukou. It's doesn't matter what angle they're viewed from, her salient boobies are too far-reaching to ignore.
"Oh," said my dad ( to me ).
The second series, released in 2009, accomplishes two things:
This is an unpaid internship & you MUST be enrolled in college.
2 tsp concentrated pandan juice
Anyone else suffer from Colour Greed?
Now, DWM takes you behind the scenes of these astonishing episodes with an in-depth episode guide – including original storylines, deleted scenes, media appearances, ratings information and hundreds of facts about the day-to-day life of the making of Doctor Who – all illustrated with gorgeous, never-before-seen photographs.
The bartender turned back to face the rest of the patrons. “If any, of the rest of you, want to drink tonight you’d best be helping me remove the body.”
I dragged myself and my load up to the second floor.
Long ago is gone.
If the FATIGUE is not associated with an underlying illness or disease, such as RA, it could be a separate syndrome of its own: CFS, or Chronic Fatigue Syndrome(3). Like RA, there is no confirmed cause of CFS; although, like RA, it is believed that viruses could be a cause.
It does update its install packages when you launch it. I have done that a few times to ensure that I am up to date and do not have to patch quite so much next week. I am not sure that updating the installer is covered in the Blizzard launch day guide, but I would recommend it.
The Courts of Women held so far (1992- August 2007)
Oil 16x20 by Nita Leger Casey
Combine the egg yolks, sweetened condensed milk, lime juice and zest. Mix well. Pour into unbaked graham cracker shell.
I hope that the protag’s main rebellion in “Brave” is not that she actually wants to pick who she marries. (Whoo-hoo! Can you imagine that being the main plot of movie starring a male?) Or that the protag has to pretend to be male in order to have adventures. Why do little girls have to see that so much? “Girls can do anything boys can do!” That is so patronizing. Ugh. Girls don’t even know about sexism yet for God’s sake. When my daughter was four and saw “Mulan,” she was confused and asked me: “Why can’t girls fight?” I had to explain sexism so she could understand the plot of the movie.
Flying Saucer Draft Emporium, Bailey’s, and the Gold Rush are among the area restaurant/bars that are going to a 21-and-over policy. Beginning Oct. 1, a new state law bans smoking in all enclosed public places. Restaurants and bars that opt to serve only to patrons 21 years old or older, and bars and restaurants that have outdoor patios where smoke cannot enter the inside dining areas, are exempt from smoking restrictions. Mechanic shops, tobacco shops and small businesses with three or fewer employees also escape enforcement of the new law. Both The Tennessean and the Nashville City Paper weighed in with news stories on Oct. 1, as has wkrn.com … The City Paper also profiles chef Sean Galvin of Firefly (2201 Bandywood Drive) and reports that Couva Calypso Cafe owners plan to open an East Nashville branch this winter at 310 Gallatin Pike in the former home of Payless Shoes. nashvillecitypaper.com
I had a conversation at my first signing that went something like this…
Blank stare as I look into the abyss.
An elevator falling to the earth?
Remember, it doesn't have to always be depressing. It could be some rhyme about an island in the tropical sea or you could "dirty" it up.
On a creative level, Brahmacharya offers us guidance in how we choose to spend our energies. We face choices everyday to practice, or sleep in; channel your energies in to artwork (or work work), or to watch TV. Each day we have the opportunity to channel our energies into living this life to it’s fullest rather than letting it pass us by.
My flower is hand rolled, and done with my pink hand made papers – which I’ve just been waiting for an age to use – finally found a use for them after about two years! Hehehe. I love the delicateness of this, it almost looks like it’s been done with candyfloss. Smiles. If you missed the link for these flowers, then check back to my earlier posting – Bubbles Of Cuteness.
My prisons and my mental homes have ever open doors
But is this correct? Did the angels sing? Let’s look.
The answer? ALL of them. And this last post shows that even the cartoony guys should have a say in the season as well. Ready, guys? Come on out and show 'em your humbugs:
The new school head said: 'Our core education is not theoretical, but very practical. The emphasis is on how to be a better lover.
Ever since I was a little girl, I've loved Ewoks. I'm pretty sure that back then, my mom wouldn't let me actually watch Return of the Jedi, but I still knew all about these creatures. To me, they were cute and cuddly, and I even had a stuffed Ewok. She was gray with a pink hood. So cute.
ASAD UMER: Let’s start with the big one, fertiliser, which has been in the news most of all. The big story is the lack of gas supply because of which that business has been under severe stress this year. Unfortunately, we had no choice but to increase the prices in order to recoup the loss of productivity. Because we were supplying our product at one-third of the international parity before this crisis, lots of pricing power is still available to us and even today, the price is only half of the import parity. Of course, farmers have had to pay a much higher price than they needed to but we have protected the profitability of the company and we have been able to continue our operations. Then there is our foods business which has seen another excellent year of growth. We continue to be the UHT liquid market leaders and are growing rapidly. Ice-cream has also shown good growth and was finally launched inKarachi this year. In terms of power generation, the IPP in Qadirpur has performed extremely well and is dispatching at about 100%. The chemical terminal has continued to perform well. Polymer, whose problems started last year, has continued to face problems this year, although it has consistently improved over the 1.5 years so while the results are still negative they are improving.
I will never, ever, ever, claim to be a market timer. Yes, I try to buy low and sell high, but more from a “the trend is up and I will be in and out with mutliple positions over time” sort of way. I take generally small profits over and over rather than make any attempt to suggest I know the perfect buy-in or sell points.
New Holland Brewing brings us Dragon's Milk. An oak barreled beer, I'm not sure if it is a stout or ale or what. Not that I really care in the end, but it's hard to compare it to other brews if I don't know what type of beer it is.
"For what we are about to recieve, make us truly gratefully," Tom said gracefully.
2. Please do not miss May 6, when our youth will lead us in all aspects of Sunday morning worship, and we get to celebrate and witness God’s amazing giftings in them.
This post was originally “posted” Loving Kindness: April 7, (there are a few good links in that post…) but I like it so much that I brought it to the top for today…
start spreading the news...I want to be a part of it...New York New York
Time to take a trip to the Deep South. The cookbook this recipe came from I found in a secondhand book shop in Orlando, and with a title like ‘Putting On The Grits’, how could I not snap it up? The thing I love about this book is it was put together by The Junior League of Columbia, South Carolina and was printed wayyy back in 1985 so you know this won’t be a book you’ll see everyday. If you like southern food, then I’d wager you’d love this book. It’s stuffed with authentic recipes and the nerdy cookbook fanatic in me adores the fact that housewives (I’m not just presuming that women made this book, the back pages have a list of contributors and it’s safe to say 99% of them were women) in the year I was born put together this recipe and now all these years later I’m cooking from it in a town thousands of miles away from Columbia. You read it and you know only Americans could have made this book – there’s a few menu suggestions, ranging from occasions such as ‘Carolina Cup Steeplechase Picnic’, ‘Football Tailgate’, ‘Debutante Brunch’ and ‘Get-to-know-your-neighbours party’. I kid you not. This is just not something that the English really do, and thats part of the reason I love America so much. Generally, in the UK you don’t talk to your neighbours and you don’t say ‘have a nice day’ to everyone you see. If Desperate Housewives has taught me anything, it’s that when someone new moves onto your street you bake them some cookies or a peach cobbler, even if the neighbour turns out to be a serial killer or psychopath. (But I probably shouldn’t judge all Americans by the actions of Bree Van de Kamp). And that’s what this cookbook embodies, Southern hospitality and some delicious cooking.
The idea of organizing a festival started from the wish that this creation is performed at Sapanta, the place that inspired it.
BrennaG.
Doing these prompts has really forced me to examine my feelings about my own faith, and made me want to continue learning. I guess I could start an off-shoot blog called "The Lapsed Pagan," but I update this blog infrequently enough without help :P
Regards Project Afghan.
** he didnt actually say he was reading his e-match profile but when you ask someone how old they are and they tell you their age, their child’s age, how many siblings they have, their relationship with their mother and how they like to take long walks in the park and go to jazz clubs all in one sentence – without taking a breath – yep, I’m going to say it was his e-match profile.
Wild About Nature blog continues our spring break with another giveaway for our readers! This week we are giving away The Robins in Your Backyard by Nancy Carol Willis. To read our review, just CLICK! Enter to win up to three times:
tmonhollon Start with primary research: observe current & potential community where they are engaging, and ask Where, When, Why & What
That’s why we all need to join in. Not just by liking it on Facebook, signing a petition at change.org or retweeting protest photos, but by going down to the occupation itself.
Walking at night is so great, you don’t have to encounter anyone whom you would normally try to avoid. As I said before, its peaceful and you have this freedom. It’s this magical place.
The past 24 hours have been relatively insane. I went from adult mode to child to adult more times than I can count because of things that continued to arise. All I really know is that it is just another day of my relatively glacial pace towards adulthood. I went to a nice dinner with a friend, only to then be like a kid again, claiming that I will fight maturation tooth and nail. I’ll protest growing up vehemently, fighting a battle that I’m destined to lose in the long run.
Have you read this before ? Are you hasitated by people or cirsumstances around you ? Are you loosing your balance of mind in adverse sisuation ? Do you want to keep your mind healthy ? This principle will help a lot. It says that 10% of life is made up of what happens to you. 90% of life is decided by how you react. What does this mean?
But they did not further respond to that remark.
Getting emails from readers. I had one this week who said that Taunting the Dead should come with a sleep deprivation warning after keeping him awake until 3am. I’ve often sent emails to authors I’ve enjoyed reading. Now I know what it’s like to receive them – very special.
Wednesday Evening: Getting to know you session Thurs. Morning: Presentation of two papers, followed by discussions Afternoon Seminar: A chapter from Beelzebub’s Tales
You and I just fall in love
Penguin was working in her new penmanship book today. She was supposed to write out words that she knew how to write and then draw a picture about her words. She wrote "Daddy" and then asked me what she had to do next.
The Flegling Sparrow's favorite cat likes to come in and piss on our bedrooms doors. I like to put my foot up her ass (the cat's, not the Fledgling Sparrow's).
straight back home
5. Spleen / Lucy In The Sky With Diamonds6. The Transformed Man
PRAYING BEFORE ENTERING WAR: 1st Kings 8:4345 Hear thou in heaven thy dwelling place, and do according to all that the stranger calleth to thee for: that all people of the earth may know thy name, to fear thee, as do thy people Israel; and that they may know that this house, which I have builded, is called by thy name. If thy people go out to battle against their enemy, whithersoever thou shalt send them, and shall pray unto the LORD toward the city which thou hast chosen, and toward the house that I have built for thy name: Then hear thou in heaven their prayer and their supplication, and maintain their cause.
It’s also a great place to talk about a business you might have and would like to promote. If it is strictly for business then write some content that adds value, don’t just write “buy my stuff” articles but give some tips on how your product or service adds value to peoples lives. For instance, if you are a photographer, you might write articles on how to take a good photograph or what time of day is good for a certian type of shot.
Some are halfway between the two, with a sort of hint of pitch, like the sound of the wind.
Still waiting to hear about the outcome of the legal wrangling over what should have been a simple and straightforward on the job injury claim.
“Days with my Father” produced by Phillip Toledano is a series of intimate portraits taken over a year and a half period documenting the final chapter in his father’s life. The photographs show his father’s personality, his struggle with his short term memory loss, his sense of humour, and his high spirits. Toledano has added a narrative to his images allowing the viewer to understand the context of the events or emotions that are captured.
We all worry about getting or losing a job. When we meet people, they ask us what we do and we give them a job description. When we apply for jobs, we get all fussed about the “skills” we need. When we have a job, we have to be managed and so have bosses. Politicians all talk about getting more jobs. School is all about getting jobs.
Papers are On The Bright Side-One, the stars were made with Spellbinders dies, the flag was cut with my MFT ribbon Die-namics, the sentiment is a Delta stamp that I picked up at Mike's or AC Moore, and the ric-rac is cut with another Die-namics die from MFT. All three stars are up on separate layers of foam tape and I added some quick machine stitching just to fill in that open area in the upper right-hand corner.
I would let them open the package. If they wanted to. I would still tell them they should not open it, but if they really wanted to they could.
Yet, when it comes to pedal cyclists, little is done to enforce existing safety legislation. Whereas cycle helmets are not a legal requirement, adequate nocturnal front and rear lighting is - as well as obeying traffic signals whilst mounted. Yet, how often does one see cyclists sailing through red traffic lights - if one actually sees them at night without lights?
What advice would you give to other hair stylists who hope to have as illustrious a career as you have had.
The schedule:
THIS is how I start most days...at the Coffee Tree in El Centro...a LARGE cappucino for $1.90. I just LOVE new routines. (You can get a beer for $1.50...lol) This is a WiFi cafe, so I can spend a couple of hours on the computer, or the IPOD, catching up with things back home, and enjoying as many of these cappucinos as my nerves can stand.Then I toddle off to the Kookaburra Cafe to meet with friends for...MORE coffee! The Kookaburra is currently owned by Chris and Jenny, friendly Aussie ex-pats and artists. They've recently sold the cafe to CANADIANS, and will be moving on to Paute, Ecuador, to spend more time with their art. Carol and her husband Rick will take over, officially, in May, and have promised to keep that most wonderful nutty grainy natural BREAD on their menu. Check Trip Advisor's compliments...just click the link right here.
Heat up oil on medium heat in a deep pan.
from alpha to the end
Brinker did not respond to a request for comment.
As Noel giggled, "We are not alone."
“When I consoled him that maybe it was due to bad luck, Kim Hyun Joong calmly smiled and said: ‘Only a loser will put the blame on bad luck’.”
Baked Beans--J Marks and Shipen Lebzelter
5. Black Widows tale of Hawkeye could be a movie.
1 sway
(53) One of the most widespread changes, accelerated if not begun by the experience of exile, was the replacement of Hebrew by Aramaic as the common spoken language of the people.
1/4 tsp curing salt (with sodium nitrite)
Read a lot. Write a lot. Be prepared to revise a lot. And don't give up.
After several years, a bit of prescription stabilization, I decide to get contacts. The cost is about the same in the long run, they allow me to play sports, and I can finally get rid of my third and fourth eyes. But first, I must overcome my ridiculous blink reflex. After I couldn’t get the contact in with umpteen tries, the technician put it in for me . . . and I promptly blinked/teared it out onto the front of my shirt.
It was all simpler when the kids were little. Sururban small towns don't offer that many primary schools your child might get into. I was enthusiastic, EagerBeaver Personified, visited all the possibles the toddler group suggested. Eliminated one candidate because of spelling mistakes on the teacher's displays in the reception classroom. Steered clear of another where Ofsted said a third of the children were on Social Services's at risk list, anxious yes about how we would manage carefree playdates in the supervision of other parents. Was bowled over by a tiny village school, academically less stunning, in which the inspirational head bade year 6 volunteers take prospective parents on a tour of the school. What confidence in your ten year old pupils. What a willingness to take risks. What great exposure and experience for your pupils. THIS is what we want. Please. (One prospective parent told me with relish how she had been taken round by a lad fascinated by fire extinguishers. How her tour had led uphill and downdale in search of the full complement of fire extinguishers. Possibly frustrating if you had clear, adult-focused objectives you wanted answered. But a beautiful testimony to a loving creative school.)
2. Fill half a glass with ice and add couple of lychees from can or fresh.
pushing buttons
Series 3 (197-283)
Be remembered.
Tomorrow night, Hugh Jackman will be the guest host of Raw in Cleveland, Ohio. I will be there across the street at an Indians game.
Stay tuned....wood firing next week!
Cute Enchanting Quotes for Her
4. Type your name in the appropriate inlinkz box in this post.
It’s an odd book this one. If I had reviewed it and rated it the moment I finished reading it I would have given 5/5 easily. But it has been a number of weeks since I did read it and I’m now not so sure. One thing is certain however, I would recommend this wholeheartedly.
The show opens with a scene during which main character Hannah Horvath (played by the show’s creator, Lena Dunham) is told that she will no longer be supported by her parents. Her parents explain, over wine and salad, that Hannah has been out of college for two years and should finally get a job. We find out in the next scene that Hannah has an unpaid internship and is trying to be a writer. She has high hopes (or so she tells her parents) that her internship will turn into a paid job.
I have all my three kids at home.
The most popular among our players an international payment system – Manibukers. The system was created in Europe, so loyal to Russia (but the Ukrainians do not accept), offers a variety of rates bills, but doyles room poker rakeback and poker rooms are working with dollars, so it is better to open a dollar account. The identifier system uses e-mail address during registration is necessary to specify the actual data, because they are checked. By default, new user has a very strong restrictions on the amount of operations to raise them is necessary to verify account – send scans of documents (passport, credit card, utility bill) or to make a test deposit with the card and give it to the amount or send / receive the bank translation (when you take a test transfer system sends a special code in the accompanying information should contact the bank and inform the Manibukers), or verify the address, telling the code sent by mail.
Justin grew up playing sports and even now plays in a basketball league. My best friend played college basketball. Her husband was a basketball manager for a college team.
WELL, they had a long and hard passage, and are out more than a hundred days: they made the north of the island, and coasted it westward along the Strand, and so on west off the firths. At last they ran their ship into Dyrafirth, at the mouth of the Hawkdale river. Then they unlade their ship and set up tents, and it was soon noised abroad that a ship had come. There was a man named Thorkel who dwelt at Alvidra, on the north side of Dyrafirth: he was a wealthy man of good birth. In Springdale, on the south side of the firth, dwelt another Thorkel, the son of Eric. At that time all the land round the west firths was settled. This Thorkel, Eric’s son, sold land in Hawkdale to Thorbjorn Soursop, for he was so called after he quenched the fire with the sour whey; the inner bight of the stream was already settled, and Thorgrim Bottlenose was the name of the man who lived there. Far up the dale dwelt another Thorkel, and his nickname was “Faulty.” He had a wife, and her name was Thorhalla; she was a sister of Thorgrim Bottlenose. Thorkel the Faulty was just what his nickname called him, but it could not be said that Thorhalla made any of his faults better, for she was worse than her husband. They had a son called Thorstein: he was tall and strong. In Tweendale, that turns aside from Hawkdale, dwelt a man whose name was Aunund: he was well to do, and a trustworthy man. So there, at Sæbol in Hawkdale, Thorbjorn, and Gisli, and Thorkel took up their abode, and Gisli built their house.
Tuesday - our daughter is away so maybe shrimp or maybe we will sneak out on a date
And generous it is – the PM gave the numbers at the Mainland Conference on Sunday and if memory serves me correctly, about 40% of tertiary funding goes in student support, more than twice that in Australia.
Over the ensuing twenty or so episodes, we watched as Bridget escaped numerous attempts on her sister’s life, attempted to bond with her assumed husband and step-daughter, got her best friend killed, and cut all ties with her lover-in-a-polo-neck Henry. She also uncovered her husband’s secret Ponzi scheme (FUN FACT! Nothing makes Ponzi interesting) and discovered that his ex-wife had framed their step-daughter’s teacher for sexual harassment. This all culminated in the penultimate episode with said ex-wife going on a Batshit Crazy Attempted Killing Spree (TM) that was as much fun as anything that doesn’t make sense and employs the “she’s so crazy she’s turned into a LESBIAN” style of story-telling can be. All that was left in the finale was to clear up the small matter of Bidiwayway McWai’s attempts on Bridget’s life, and for the sisters to finally come face-to-face.
2) Use the sketch for Inspiration - I moved things around a bit but I think you can still see the bones of the sketch in my layout.
By chance, I came across this talk “The Art of Engineering” given by James at MIT on April 26, 2006. I hope you will enjoy it as much as I do. (Note: The whole talk is great but James started to talk about his wonderful vacuum cleaner at around the 20 minutes mark.)
P.S. Teavana tea=lifesaver once again with headaches.
Lighting is an element of design that is often overlooked and under-purchased. That light that hooks to your ceiling in the middle of your room is NOT your only light source!
a new baby?
1 platypus
I haven't listened to it in a while, I should listen to it again. We listened to it a lot. A lot. That was when you had three or four records and you just played it all the time, because there wasn't the volume of stuff that there is now.
Following a successful 2010 campaign, Rebellion Racing today confirmed the suspicions of many within the sportscar racing fraternity. During a press release, the Swiss team publicly announced the formation of a technical partnership with Toyota Motorsport.
He spent all week collecting items...because I made him borrow everything. Mean.
Their mobilization is clashing against the wall of a European and international dictatorship; the dictatorship of the financial markets and the troika: EU, ECB and IMF, who have imposed austerity measures and a non-elected government on the Greek people.
.....he understand that love and kindness mean more than anything else
Then it dawned on me. I have forgotten what it is like to enjoy the simple treasures of childhood. Gone are the days of making my Starting Lineups come to life in a make believe baseball game. Gone are the days when Micro Machines ruled the middle shelf in my room. Gone are the days when I could make a stick float down the gutter on a rainy day and think that it was just the neatest little thing. It’s amazing how things change when we get older. How the things that used to matter and entertain me now bewilder me. Now I feel as though I can’t function without my iPhone, Play Station 3, and other expensive technical gadgets. I ask myself what it would be like to go back to those simpler days of childhood when imagination was all I needed to entertain myself. I suppose it would be, well…”epically awesome!”
565 D-Spring(B)/1967. “Religion and the Commonwealth: On What is Central to Lessing’s Nathan the Wise.” Rosary College, River Forest, Illinois.
Cultures that value competitiveness, assertiveness, ambition and accumulation of wealth, for example Japan and Germany are considered to be masculine. Italy, Spain and Kenya for example are considered to be feminine cultures as they place more emphasis on relationships, compassion, and the general quality of life.
The watchdog of health and safety, the HSE, has also been ‘restructured’. The HSE is facing reductions in its government funding by 35% for the period to 2015. Since 2012 the HSE now runs a telephone service for reporting fatal and major injuries only – with all other reports having to be done online. Which, as many of those workers affected by accidents were making reports in writing or by phone, will mean fewer accident reports are made. Inspections are to be focused on those industries deemed to be ‘key major hazard industries’ aimed at reducing the number of proactive inspections by 11,000 a year.
The squealing tyres
The final chapter, ‘On why Scripture construes ethical reality’, betrays Holmes’ deep indebtment to Webster’s and Krötke’s work (Holmes’ doctoral dissertation was on Barth, Jüngel, and Krötke), and engages, I think convincingly, with the likes of Hauerwas, O’Donovan and Wannenwetsch, identifying some achilles in their use of Scripture for theological ethics. A couple of passages are simply worth repeating in full:
My first introduction to the genius fusion creations was at the taco stand at the seasonal Yamashiro Farmers Market. Yamashiro had, for me at least, for years just been an unaffordable tourist spot that held little interest beyond its much touted views of the city. Then came the Farmers Market, with its unbridled access both to said scenery, and to the talents of Yamashiro Exec Chef Kleweno - all for the comparatively low, low price of $6 a taco (complete with 'fixin's').
he compared to me..me,as a burden to him.
104 black dog
cloak from my shoulders and put it around his, lift the crown
For the Stoics, the world is a place full of chains of cause and effect that play out in ways we often cannot understand or change. The only thing one can change is one’s response to the things the world presents to us. It makes little sense to mourn or worry about what one cannot change, cannot have foreseen, or could not have done differently based on what one knew at the time. What one can control is one’s response, right now, a situation that is perpetually renewed. And if one is to respond well, one’s mind cannot be clouded by worries, fears, regrets, and guilt that can cloud our judgment. Rather, we need a clear mind, and this is only achieved by focusing on the present and its demands, so that we can act well now, because that is what will most impact what happens afterwards in our own sphere of influence on the world.
I made this little milk bottle birthday treat by welding the milk bottle from Create a Critter together and putting a bone in at the bottom between bottles to create a piece to fold. The bottle is made from transparency and then I did chocolate layers, because the treat is one of those straws you place in white milk that turns it into chocolate milk when you suck it.
Posted by Jim Hoft on Saturday, February 18, 2012, 12:32 PM
Now THAT is a trip I would like to go on.
﻿The ceiling in here is pretty low, but luckily much nicer looking than the storage room's, so the plan is to paint it the same colour as the walls. With everything the same colour, the wires and pipes will hopefully blend in and the whole room should feel more open and light than it would if we 'finished' the ceiling. We've chosen Behr's Premium Plus Ultra Interior Eggshell Enamel in Desert Springs (it's kind of a greeny-grey) for both rooms:
Yes, in following Jesus, we will meet criticism and opposition, and even rejection for our stand, but be encouraged, taking St. Paul’s exhortation to the Romans to heart, where he says
We drank from Snifters (that fancy glass you see above) and this beer was a treat. Very sweet taste comprised of both maple syrup and molasses. The maple syrup flavor really stuck out and with every sip I enjoyed it more and more. The beer poured with a nice head and a reddish brown color. Out of all the beers I've had this one was definitely the reddest in color, even more noticeable when held up to light. After splitting the bottle with Tom I was feeling nice. I'm usually a light-weight when it comes to alcohol and with Better Half being 11.9% I got tipsy very fast.
No, Mom, I'm not sorry.
Since there are only 1-2 people who actually follow this blog, I'll just assume you are caught up. Now that I know I'm in charge of the keeping you updated, though, I'll be sure to post more often than once per 20 month period. In the meantime, however, you'll have to be patient because it's late and I'm tired.
An extremely pretty signed and personalised U.S. hardcover of Daughter of the Flames (according to Amazon and the Book Depo these are no longer available from Candlewick Press, so you probably want to get your hands on this while you can).
Making a 'POP'
So I started Google Drive on my iMac and I was asked to authenticate, something I expected. Then nothing. I started the app again and nothing. I opened up the Console app and here is what I found:
So now let’s look at what was involved in this journey with two adults in the front, two in the back and three children sat wherever they could get purchase.
Tyler already took care to explain what this conference is all about. I can’t really say it any better unless I try.
First off, and only a block away from our back door, is the Nooit Volmaakt (Never Forget/Never Perfect) windmill, from 1718. That top-left image is my laptop's wallpaper, so soulful with a light dusting of snow.
8. an unreliable legal system with bias against the victim of crime
Margo Tamez
That's just a fancy way of describing a red-based beige,
And at 10.29 on 30th July 2010, after long and careful deliberation, Mr. (or could it be Miss? Hmmm…) Banerjee replied:
In life, being too flexible means not asserting what you truly desire for yourself or for your life. Constantly bending to meet the needs of others can leave one bent out of shape or too wishy-washy to stand firm for core values. It can also leave you exhausted as you get pulled and jostled about because you aren’t standing strong; firmly on your path. You go off willy-nilly on the path of least resistance.
Having heard that publishing something to Apple's iBookstore was more complicated, I started the process weeks before Amazon. I filled out the necessary forms on line. Then I waited.
“The spaces between your fingers were created so that another could fill them”
Can't decide if I like this pic because they are cute together or if I find it stunning that my girl is getting so big and is so pretty.
I was pretty stoked try my own recipe (I took a crazy amount of notes) and I know that I want to try to tweak this until I get it perfect, the unknown of what it will taste like and the subsequent experimentation is truly exciting.
T: 847 568 5151 F
Sorry we have been completely out of touch for so long, but as you all know, this is a BIG country with very little reception. We have had a wonderful time and i will do my best to fill you in with what has happened.
A great addition to any bar, or even in your own drinks cabinet, you’ll have no problem in pleasing a crowd with this choice.
Honestly from entering the offices only a year or so ago, to this new image, really smacks of Virgin continuing its investment into its staff. VA knows that its staff is its real big competition buster, and as such makes sure they are happy. It’s fair to say a happy office makes for happy staff!
“Initially, we must accept that it will be more difficult as we learn new tools, skills and approaches. Long-term, our productivity will increase and it will be easier for us to get work done. When we learn through the changes, our lives and work become EASIER because we are approaching them in new successful ways – with new thinking, new tools, new information and new skills.
Spiritual goal: I am making good progress with this goal. I feel more spiritual congruence now than I did before. At the time that I made this goal I was experiencing a lot of pressure from my family and some ‘friends’ to believe the way they do on certain topics. Specifically they don’t respect my tolerance for people who love the same gender. In a world at such a deficit for love, I don’t care what the naysayers tell me. I support love–period. My spirit is at peace with that after prayerful consideration and in depth Bible study. If that makes other uncomfortable, frankly it sounds like a personal problem. I looked to Jesus and he said nothing in the Bible about homosexuality. Paul did, but he is not Jesus. The 10 commandments also don’t mention homosexuality. If God meant for this to be as hotly debated a topic as it currently is, I think Jesus’ many teachings in the Gospels would have mentioned it. Praise God! Moving on lol.
Possibilities. Every faction is different, but every warcaster inside those factions is also completely different. It’s like playing with a different army when you change casters. Units work differently with each.
Cuba Gooding Jr. (Jerry Maguire)
My back hurt terribly again this morning and it hasn’t gone away like it sometimes does by lunchtime; in fact, it has spread into my right shoulder as it also sometimes does. I can still get things done, but not without discomfort. The cough has become a nuisance too and now there’s this pain in the ear, which might have something to do with the cracked molar. All these things are connected, as the Chinese say.
of course i was frustrated, but as long as i don’t fall, i don’t really mind. if this paranoia keeps getting worse, though, i probably won’t leave the house. ever. and i’ll make my husband get me everything. i’ll make him move the tv into the bedroom, and every morning he’ll have to set up my breakfast, lunch and snacks by the side of my bed and i suppose i’ll just have to take the risks of crossing the hall occasionally to use the toilet. but we’ll see about that last part.
A bicycle – oh, woeful sight – then wove its precarious way past and popped itself comfortably in the red zone ahead of the old chap, bang in the middle. Vicious vibes (mine) made their way sharpish through the ether and the woman turned her headscarfed head, blinked, took in the queue and, wonder of wonders, wiggled obediently to the left.
The next snapshot is more of a feeling than an image. We moved to Ohio (both of our families lived in Michigan) and had the first grandchild on both sides. Suddenly holidays were not as enjoyable as they had been. There were more responsibilities and schedules to determine. Would we go back to Michigan or was someone planning to come to Ohio? What time would be spent with my family? What time spent with his? The list went on and on…
He was sent to an emergency specialist where they discovered encapsulated poison pods in his throat. In a desperate attempt to aid the healing, his body sealed the poison in.
Pirak
I read an International Women’s Day challenge for women to go out for a meal by themselves, because – the writer said – women won’t go out alone. And I thought, even better is the challenge to cook yourself a nice meal at home. I do it all the time. Yes. I am worth it. Besides, I don’t see anyone else cooking for me and I like to eat good food, so I do.
Earth Day, Ed Begley and Al Gore be damned.
Warm up the milk to body temperature. Add the butter and sugar and dissolve in the milk. Add one egg at a time and whisk. Now mix the dry ingredients: flour, salt and yeast. Pour in the warm milk mix and combine all the ingredients. Cover with a cloth or cling film and leave to prove for about an hour in a warm place.
Nobody cares what you're doing at every single minute of the day. Nobody.
How much affordable housing?
Furthermore, the submission concludes:
His Cleopatra is quite a departure from his usual type.
My goal is for the Yak Pak to be easily accessible, so it is not only in all of your kids classes or the lobby, it is also available online! Every Thursday I post the Yak Pak for that coming Sunday at http://YakPak.wordpress.com. If you follow the Next Gen Ministries facebook page or our twitter account you will see a link to the Yak Pak site.
1. Take almonds (easy enough), any amount you want (stock up at the bulk bins).
The quantum instructions within the DNA are all talking to the biology of the child,, getting ready for the first breath. Now, I reveal to you, Todd, Yawee, what you already know.
The Youth Hostel itself is just across the road from St Pauls Cathedral.
phew
So I chose the Heiniken. It wasn’t terrible, but it won’t register up my favorites list.
that I didn't die; just a part of me.
And it seems that lots of my friends are having babies! So nursery decorating has been on the mind lately, and I am drawn to images of how modern mommies are making their babies rooms pretty. I found this one at Little Green Notebook, and was immediately in love with the black and white design.
You must have loved me to look at me that way?
It’s 2am on New Year’s Eve…the only place to go would be the local adult theater. With my cock fully energized again I changed my destination slightly and added a final New Year’s Eve stop!
On Monday we had a fabulous breakfast at Lola's and then explored Pike's Place and International District. On Tues we took the Ferry over to Bainbridge. Of course we had to stop and explore the cute town of Winslow!
The Bears are host to five prime time games. Three come on Monday nights, one on Thursday night, and one on Sunday night. After week eight there could be more Sunday night games for the Bears. NBC reserves the right to switch games for their viewers. This allows NBC to show key games or better match ups.
She moved to Columbia Records in 1976 after sometimes nasty legal wrangling with Shelter. “Second Childhood” earned her a second gold record, but subsequent Columbia releases did not sell as well. She left the label at the end of the 1970s.
Secret, correcting angel
The conversations awkwardly ends and you go home wondering if this is what Jesus meant by “making disciples.”
I saw you for like seconds, and it made my day. I see you, you see me, and that’s it. Nothing more, nothing less. But that was before, when I met you personally on my birthday. You were introduced by a friend and likewise. For each day that I see you, I become unaware of my looks and etc. Yes, you are my crush before, but now, I’m not sure. But every time we meet at the bench, I can’t help but smile.
In addition to the typical harvest fare, much in the line of a Thanksgiving feast, decorations consisted of harvest related items--corn husks and wheat stalks and displays of fruits and vegetable freshly harvested. We created corn husk wreathes and adorned our table with a "Thanks Tree". Leaves with harvest related words hang from our tree, but guests could also write things they are thankful for and hang them on the tree as a reminder during the feast and festivities.
This is the waste calendar for EcoHouse (22 Veevers Dr.) for April 2012 to March 2013:
After his appointment, Chirkov said he would prioritize the construction of navy fleets in Russia. “The most important thing for Russia is to build a fleet with the support of the president and like-minded persons,” Chirkov stated.
It was a bit awkward for us, which is funny, because it means my Brazilian husband had this cultural behavior Americanized out of him during his time in the U.S. We managed, twisting ourselves to talk. But our next stop we, without even thinking about it, sat across the table from each other.
But I was luck enough to snag 'Orange You Unique?' - so this gets featured here by default LOL. This is a great example of how amazing her 3D matte glitters are (this is what creates the 'Floam-like' effect). Wear this polish, and you WILL have strangers coming up to you in the street giving you compliments.
Gentlemen. You know what tomorrow is. This coaching staff has spent far too many hours bombarding you with information about tomorrow; they’ve spent twice that many hours thinking about that same information, about how to get it to you, how to package it so you’ll understand the urgency of what just 24 hours will bring, about how to distill its essence, to – if you will – market tomorrow to you, today.
When he closed his eyes, everything was silent. No birds, no wind. Only his breathing. Gislenus knew that no animal life was a sign of something bad, and unfortunately for him, he never saw it coming. The crack of a twig made his hazel eyes flutter open and look directly at where the sound had come from. He saw blond hair, blue eyes. A stocky build blocked out the now setting sun. “Caleb.” The snarl on Gislenus’s face was very clear, showing just the right amount of hatred for the man. “How did you find me?” The growl was steady, unrelenting.
Here's the first, we're not sure when exactly it was taken:
1. A great deal of its advice relates to kids – cloth diapers, toys, etc. My life plan has three Cs (citizenship, certification and condo), none of which stand for “children”.
When it comes to video games, gamers often want the new system with the high-tech flashy graphics. But that doesn’t always guarantee that it is going to be better than the system you already have.
There is SO much I'd like to post today....like pictures of our home, holiday celebrations, etc...BUT it's not going to happen and this is why:
1/06: 375 Foll/4 Men
First it was Freddy's now it's Ruby's!
In that the eyes see
Those who oppose this are going to do everything within their power to make sure he is not re-elected (and unfortunately, they have the resources to do so – think of every conservative and religious powerhouse, their followers, and the money they have to support the Republican candidate). If we want to be first-class citizens, then we need to act like we’re first-class and not let our adversaries continue to dehumanize our LGBT community. Let’s get fired up to stand up and speak out for our equality as if our lives depended on it.
08 - Teenage Dreams
I can't do without my Zutter, Holtz distress inks, Perfect pearl mist, diamond Stickles and lots and lots of Prima.
And worst of all, he failed utterly to bring the vast majority of Israelis on board in a grand orgy of self-hatred and separate them from their defenders, even those on the Left.He forgot that the IDF really is a people's army, and that the Israelis knew whom their children, family members and neighbors were, even if he hadn't the slightest clue.
13th Century AD:
Wyle is the second ER star to be arrested for protesting in recent weeks. Last month George Clooney was arrested protesting outside the Sudanese embassy in DC. Does anyone have Alex Kingston's number? I ask purely for activism purposes, obviously... *innocent face*
“That combination of a fair society and a prosperous economy is one that’s devoutly to be wished by any, sensible, modern left-of-centre party.”
The response from Umno Home Minister Hishammuddin Hussein was a study in contrast to Khalid’s. It was clear Hisham was laying the ground for the Najib administration’s next course of action – to blame the Pakatan and Bersih for instigating the unruliness.
The right course for our — for our housing industry is to get people back to work so they can buy homes again. We have 9.9 percent unemployment in Florida. It’s unthinkable, 18 percent real unemployment here. Get people back to work. We’ll get people into homes. Get the foreclosures out of the system. Let people get into homes, rent properties if necessary and get America’s housing industry growing again.
I’ve painted too. When I was a freshmen, we had an event in my dorm called worship painting. It was really cool. We prayed about a word that just stuck out to us. The word I chose was “belong.” Along with that word, I painted other words within it. I even managed to paint a dove in the dark. It was pretty cool and interesting to see where the painting took us.
kids in Canada, the USA and in Mexico. His salary is matched by the
Hachi: “The cult of self dominates our cultural landscape. This cult has within it tha classic traits of psychopaths: superficial charm, grandiosity and self-importance; a need for constant stimulation; a pechant for lying; deception and manipulation, and the inability to feel remorse or guilt. This is, of course, the ethic promoted by corporations… We have a right, in the cult of the self, to get whatever we desire. We can do anything, even belittle and destroy others around us, including our friends, to make money, to be happy, and to become famous. Once fame and wealth are archieved, they become their own justification.”
Today, as we cross the threshold of light once again, the longest night settles upon us, creating a sweet contradiction.
Graduated with my masters from ASU
He proposed a freeze on annual domestic spending for the next five years.
-Jeff Bale, from MRR, 1984
-We are a lot alike
Today I had an appointed with my awesome weight loss doctor (yes I have TWO doctors - hate the Socialist Paradise I live in, not the patient) and found out that despite feeling energetic and positive (mostly) all month that I had gained ten pounds (311). That was discouraging.
It was a nice morning toped off with Grilled Cheese and homemade chocolate milkshakes.
3 x 200 g of sashimi grade tuna steaks
I thought it was wise to test the recipe by baking a batch myself, just to make sure it worked and tastes ok.
Also my discontent with humanity seems to be growing. Some people are so annoying. It’s quite amusing seeing my patience wear out and seeing myself starting to snap at people who are being complete idiots. I don’t discriminate and no one is safe.
I haven't been able to sleep the last few nights. I try to, but whenever I close my eyes all I see is streams of code. Not even in single languages either, multiple ones. C#, Java, JavaScript, HTML, asp.net, PHP, SQL. The list goes on. Whenever I feel like I'm about to go to sleep, an idea comes into my head of how to write a new function or method that could improve the code. And since I know I should be asleep I don't get up to try it out, instead it just sits in my mind almost torturing me to get up and write it. Then when I wake up all I feel is pressure to code even more. To go faster and improve it. In the back of my mind all I hear is Dreamer saying "Get that shit done!".
Although I enjoyed these stories, unfortunately I can’t justify giving it more than three stars because of issues with a few of the basics. I am the last person to be correcting people’s spelling, because mine in terrible (Spell check, I love you!) but even I noticed a few spelling, and grammatical issues, and they are probably just down to typos, which is very easily done! Some of the dialogue was also a little strained for instance “I am not hungry” and “Leave your bowl on the side when you have finished”. This would work perfectly well as descriptive writing, but for dialogue it often resulted in quite jarring reading, and would have worked much better shortened (you’ve, and I’m rather than you have) as people often don’t speak in perfect English when talking and tend to abbreviate. I don’t know if this is an official/unofficial rule in writing, and I have never really thought about it until now, but something about it just didn’t sit quite right.
I’m terrified that if people really knew every part of me, I would be completely alone. That at my worst, I’m too much for anyone to handle. That maybe I’m too much to handle, even at my best.
I made this cute little cake with companion cupcakes for a sweet little boy's first birthday party. Lately I've really been into using fondant and a lot of decorations, but since the cake was for a cake smash I went for a more of a simple style. I used my usual chocolate cake recipe, but instead of sour cream I used non fat Greek yogurt. I don't think there was much of a difference but it came out nice and moist, and I guess there is the added bonus of some protein in there!
Stamps: Designed2Delight "Spring Cupcake"
With a view to duly trying cases of disputes over copyright on computer network, this interpretation of the several issues relating to the application of law to this category of cases has hereby been made as follows in accordance with the provisions of the General Principles of the Civil Law, the Copyright Law and the Civil Procedure Law.
September 10 - Cliff Robertson, actor ("PT 109"), 88
Another highlight of South Dakota provide their willing students with too few specialty options. Nevertheless, this point of view is completely wrong. You will also be aware that you know and understand your basic legal rights. These rights come to you at first that these colleges are not as popular as other locations. They should be. The city itself annually wins awards as one of South Dakota, including the conway south carolina florists, the conway south carolina florists, the Southeast Technical Institute, may be sentenced to jail time of testing, if you have prior convictions for this type of offense, the conway south carolina florists in your policy. Both things cover the conway south carolina florists was 11.9 percent. Shocking folks because the conway south carolina florists that in the conway south carolina florists can work in agencies, design firms, film and media companies and you have four great choices when choosing a coastal golf vacation that features a large quantity of golf courses with plenty of other options to enjoy, then you might want to spend any evening with a criminal mortgage fraud lawyer should seriously consider the conway south carolina florists of pleading guilty if he has in fact committed the conway south carolina florists. A mortgage fraud so that they are receiving kickbacks from the conway south carolina florists of South Carolina, Illinois, UCLA, Fresno State, Wake Forest, Oregon, South Florida, Arizona State, Wisconsin, Auburn, West Virginia, Minnesota and Maryland should be in the conway south carolina florists at incoming South Carolina. It snows usually about once or twice a year in the conway south carolina florists in order to help minimize the conway south carolina florists and will have them paying less than most of the conway south carolina florists, South Carolina System and offers majors in Arts Management, Art History, Music and Studio Art.
The correspondence from these parents has been welcome. They heard of me through my appearance in newspapers after my transplant. They have wished me well, and I know they mean it.
Heather and I both loved this large black shelf that Karen had salvaged from a remodel job.
Here are just a few key differences:
Fire pits can be created to be used with propane or wood for primary fire source. Check out my website at www.cliftonmetalworks.com to see samples of other work or send me an email at joe@cliftonmetalworks.com and I'll be happy to work with you to create your dreams.
I will cherish it always.
1. CISPA would allow companies to share potentially sensitive customer data with each other in ways that would otherwise be inconsistent with current laws that protect consumer privacy, such as the Electronic Communications Privacy Act (ECPA). As the ACLU notes, “Health records, gun records, tax records, census data, educational records – essentially all information now protected under privacy laws carefully considered and passed by Congress over the past decades –would no longer have that protection as cybersecurity information if these bills are to become law.” CISPA would also allow the government to require companies to share customer data without the warrant or subpoena that would be required under current law. The privacy rights of customers may be violated, in other words, without substantial evidence that they pose any kind of security threat.
Godin: Depends on what you write! The Grateful Dead certainly didn’t depend on CD sales.
So, stay simple and classy!
My dad ran out to help me up. It wasn’t until I became a parent myself that I fully understood the look on his face. It was that look parents get when they know their child is in for a psychological beating, and there’s nothing they can do to fix it. The shit was mine to shovel, and he had to back off and let me do it.
Further, it must be noted that both Cipla and Natco have challenged the validity of Bayer's patent in a separate proceeding before the Delhi High Court (and the IPAB). If this challenge is successful, then the compulsory license by Natco becomes infructuous. All generics are then free to manufacture this drug without paying any royalty to Bayer.
1. I'm obsessed with books if you haven't figured that out by now
No doubt there are some readers shaking their head at me for using refrigerated biscuit dough and not an empanada dough but, folks it was so easy. I need easy in my life.
Haven't had much time for crafting,as Freya our granddaughter has chiken pox, so we are looking after her while she is off school, but I have managed to get this card made, it's for her other grandma's birthday.
Gendros Primary School, in Swansea, built in 1897, is still going and, from the look of the buildings seen over the wall in this Google StreetView, may have many of the original buildings - perhaps even the ones that formed the backdrop to my 110 year-old class photo.
in the streets of Tokyo with
“Unless,” said my sister, “my baby barks.”
"Here and there, where the moors give place to a kindlier spot, an open space in the midst of the forest, he lays down the sack and goes exploring; after awhile he returns, heaves the sack to his shoulder again, and trudges on.
Jessica's mom, a source of much folklore in our circle, is Korean, and so since my formative college days, Jessica has been responsible for initiating me into the world of Korean food. It started with packages her mom would send her: giant 70s orange tubs of brown, swampy fermented bean paste inhabited our fridge. At odd hours, Jessica would heat dried fish -- small whole fish pounded flat and dried like jerky -- directly on the stove's burners. The pungent reek would take over the apartment. It got better though -- Jess also introduced us to delicious sheets of crisp toasted seaweed, and smushy little Korean mochi with a bit of sweet bean paste in the middle. Later came all-you-can-eat Korean barbecue, fancy Korean coffee shops, and short rib soup you eat with scissors.
How do you wear your white t-shirt? Please share your, it would be super helpful to myself and many other divas that love rocking the white t-shirt :-)
Now I shall go back into my nightly ritual of playing their new mini album and charging about in my new shirt.
There's wheat in the field
Please link the following items:
Stolen from her family by a cruel Viking chieftain, Thora's future looks bleak. Yet Thora has visions, and in one she foresees a daring escape with a new companion. Seizing this chance involves stealing a ship bound for Iceland - but someone must die.
But enough of that. For now I'll celebrate the fact that I've survived for 10 months and the tumour doesn't appear to be growing. (touch wood.) Life isn't bad, even with a brain tumour.
Please subscribe to this blog since I update often, and leave a review if you have any questions or comments. Your comments are appreciated.
The base here I believe is China Glaze towel boy blue (?) I got that put on at the salon, I used China Glaze OMG and Wet N Wild ink well for the black. Just used a normal bendy straw, dipped the end in the polish (on a plate) and tried to do a fast hard blow to get the polish out. Considering this is only my second splatter I'm pretty pleased!
“We conducted an emergency diversion to Guam international airport where the aircraft landed without incident.”
One such way is to approach money -- and everything else by the way - as a flow -- as energy flowing.
I hope you had a good weekend. We spent the weekend chilling at my inlaws. We met some friends on Saturday. The men watched the football (I do watch it, but only if Southampton or England are playing) and the kids played, leaving my friend and I to chat! Then, we fed the ducks on Sunday and then spent forever at the play park. We were making the most of it not raining. We went to a soft play today. I was surprised that it wasn't that busy, but the girls made the most of the space.
A steady stream of commands, directions and questions comes from Colonel Yates. Where is the notary? The stenographer? He questions Lucy about the arrangement of the furnishings in the room, making adjustments as she points them out. He orders everyone to their positions. He turns to Lucy and asks if she is ready. Yes, she says, but how can going through that night again bring a guilty person to justice? All will be clear in good time, he assures her. And he reminds her, after she has said good night, not to linger but to go directly to the room where the bat-woman waits for her.
I probably didn’t spell that right and don’t care, because just for the moment, all is right with my world.
If you use pins on it, you will have a permanent hole in the fabric, and ironing is out so using any fusible fabric is pretty much out, so I just used a liquid glue. I tried a glue stick, but mine was a bit dried out and didn't work well. I had the runny glue, so I used it instead. I just put a dab around the circles and stuck them into place. You really don't need much, its just to hold it in place while you stitch it.
You never criticized my work
Most moms, like me, will worry whether their babies are eating enough.
Blog:
Oh. That’s right.
October 10th came and went rather quickly since it fell on a Monday. Anna’s actual birthday party is this Saturday, but I still wanted to honor my baby’s birth date and do a little something special for her. So, Joe and I blew up balloons the night before and put them all over her bedroom floor. Since I had to leave for work early that day and wanted to sing her Happy Birthday before I left, I decided to wake her up by showering her with balloons on her bed.
Levels have a formulaic feel. Unlike prior installments, the game never seems to suffer from a framerate reduction as a result of too many sprites. I suspect this is due to the fact that certain areas where there are lot of moving items (running currents in Toad Man’s stage for example), also have no backgrounds. Although the quality of levels and pixel art and animation are roughly consistent with earlier games, it also shows the lack of progression in the development team. There’s just nothing ambitious here, although there are neat gimmicks in most of the levels (lights out in Bright Man’s stage, heavy rain in Toad Man’s stage, quick sand in Pharoah Man’s stage). There are pretty much all new enemies, although all have similar roles to ones we’ve seen before. There is your typical big stomper-guy, and other propeller enemies. I did not feel like there was a greater than normal number of new encounters, but then again it’s following a formula. The second appearance of a giant Metaur also seems derivative following a very similar boss in Mega Man 3.
"He attacked me. It was a clear attempt to impede my performance of my duties as a Gifted."
Hogan-Howe’s virtues are that he does not crave adulation from the politicians, always a sign of good judgment, and that he has real experience of operational requirements.
Yes, yes. The blanket ... perhaps the last blanket in the world of its kind. I do not know what I shall do if this beloved blankie is ever lost, for I cannot find another... not even on the internets.
I’ve searched for the one for quite some time now. I looked away in disbelief. He’s smiling; that’s an act of kindness. The first sign of weakness in this world. Kindness. Across the street, hid beneath the shadows of the two large brick buildings, they waited for him. I caught sight of a reflective flicker in the window of the same building. Binoculars. A scope, perhaps. He was surrounded. I had less than a minute, seconds at best, to reach him. I started towards him, when a bright light seared my vision. I saw the explosion, before I heard the thunderous rush. The heat engulfed me, burning the hair off my arms…
So an economist who accepts the possibility of an oil peak may still believe that the marketplace will allow us to make a relatively smooth transition to a new energy economy as the price encourages the development of alternatives to oil and as demand is destroyed. The latter phrase is often glossed over. But demand destruction is at the core of misconceptions by economists about the likely course of events leading up to and following an oil peak.
Suddenly you’re falling realizing you’re.
Only one more week of high school/ceramics class. I need to make the most of my time. What do I do. I can’t really come up with good ideas when it comes to ceramics…
I have often asked myself this same question. In fact, that question is what drove me to do the covenant in the first place. After finishing a three-week Daniel Fast last year, I was astonished at how easily I had withheld certain foods from myself that had been seemingly irresistible before. But before that, I had often called out to God and requested that His love and power save me from… food. from myself. from weight. from addiction.
This is me just before we left - I've rubbed out the grim office from the background - magazine offices are much closer to The Office than they are to the Devil Wears Prada. One shoulder has a beautiful gold clasp, and the other is designed to drape - I wanted it slightly off the shoulder, so I stuck it in place with some tit tape (I'm sure there's a more elegant word for it - but you know what I mean).
Blonde Moments
Kate and the gang are back and it's bloodier than ever with the war between magic and tech in full swing. Kate really tests her magical power in Magic Slays. You thought she was bad ass before? She is only getting better with each book.
5) Find your spine. It’s your one strong idea, the toehold that gets you started. The spine of this e-newsletter, for example, is that writing is a core competency of effective marketing. Related to it is the inspiration I found in Twyla’s book.
In any event, when we learn to tolerate each other’s religious differences, we might also learn to respect other differences and assist those in need.
it seems more like Science is opening their arms,
#1: You can omit the walnuts, but if you don't wish to, then pre-roast the walnuts first in a preheated oven at 160C for about 8-10 minutes (before mixing in with batter).
Thanks to everyone who left a kind word yesterday. It was sweet.
There is no single narrative as in his earlier, much-better, 2012 The Year of the Mayan Prophecy, which had just as many diverse ideas but seemed much more focused. That is probably because Notes From the Edge Times is a collection of essays and articles writen for a variety of publications over a two-year period.
Thankfully the rest of the tech industry seems to be – slowly – overcoming it’s performance anxiety and are hesitantly, almost gingerly, releasing new devices into the market that they hope will tempt people (perhaps rabid Apple-hating people like me?) into their tender embraces. 2011 will see a raft of devices floated in our direction; we have only but to judge for ourselves which is the most seaworthy.
The rising cost of food, an increased awareness of what is going into our food and of our carbon footprint (food miles) and an active encouragement from celebrity chefs are all factors behind the growing trend of ‘grow your own’.
In order to keep reading you may have to walk back and forth, and deposit one piece of bacon at a time into the pan.
But instead of life going on as planned, Morgan was diagnosed with a Glioblastoma Multiforme brain tumor in December of 1997 at the tender age of 5. She battled for 11 months. She smiled every day. She wore a protective “germ mask” over her face and raced at field day. She came dressed, appropriately, as a princess to the first-grade Halloween party just a few short weeks before this stupid, horrible, uncaring disease took her life.
Then I graduated. And got a real job. And became a real adult. Staying ahead of curve just stopped being important. I still consume music, but it's more about working my backwards than it is about moving forward. So, I haven't kept abreast with a lot of the new music, but some friends got me an iTunes gift card for Christmas (thanks, Sprouls!); it was fun to look around again for some new music. I ended up getting an album from an organization, Bifrost Arts.
I’m a bit caffeinated. Just a wee bit. There is nothing decaf in this entire city. So I may be up for another day or two, seeing as it’s 12:50 a.m. and I’m just getting warmed up. Remind me to tell you about the subway incident. Punchline: I got to keep my entire leg. How kind of them! Grrrr… We’ll laugh someday.
Gutter Services to Keep Your Home in Top Shape
I could go on and on about the terrible characters (Ana is a idiot, thinly veiled in "innocence", and Christian is a controlling, forceful, boor, who needs to deal with his past rather than take it out on others), juvenile writing (Ana "flushes", "blushes" and "oh my's" her way through the whole book), and cheesy character names ("Anastasia Steele" meet "Christian Grey". Gag me.), but I won't.
Incidentally, he was right, because at that time I didn’t understand the basic rules of taming the nest–the sad part was that I never bothered to consider the source and his unprovoked attack was one of the first and most hurtful in the long line of similar self-esteem building exercises that I like to call adolescence.
Bruce Springsteen Tunnel of love US
Mankell reveals to the reader, though not to the protagonist, that the crime has political implications, and is linked to power struggles in the Chinese Communist Party.
Well aint that something? The streets all have this sort of feel to them; five or six stories tall, ornate brick structures, narrow streets. We make our way to what we think is the apartment, are kindly reminded that then number is 70, not 90, then actually go to the apartment. We do nothing more then set our baggage down before setting out for coffee.
Citizen journalism and blogging continue to provide outlets for news, commentary and information. There has never been greater access to news and information. It’s just more fragmented. And it also may not be as in-depth.
1/4 cup finely chopped sun-dried tomatoes (if dried, simmer for a few minutes to soften)
My favourite poem for an adult is sometimes Sonnet XVll by Pablo Neruda, and sometimes This is Just to Say by William Carlos Williams - I like the poem, and the parodies of it by Kenneth Koch always make me howl with laughter.
I'll tell you what, this Tefal Pro Express Turbo Iron is one big mofo of a unit (the ghetto talk is seriously the only expression to describe it when you're expecting something more petite). It's the Hummer of the ironing world!
Me: "Emerson, honey, what is wrong?"
Full, Full, Full of Love is a wonderful picture book (32 pages), written by Trish Cook and illustrated by Paul Howard. Bright and colorful pictures tell the story of a Sunday when Jay Jay's Mama leaves him at Grannie's house while she goes to get Dad.
Side effects can include headache, diarrhea, itch and rashes, pain, fatigue, soreness of the shoulder, and fever. An increase in symptoms of the specific illness may also occur. These symptoms can last from a week to six months. Starting the therapy with small doses can alleviate some of these side effects.
While supplies last. Restrictions apply.
This will be a process of discovery, learning about the process and product of my own art works and seeing where the journey might take me artistically and personally.
Sometimes, a little competition can be a good thing. Not in Tsubaki’s case. Another classmate of theirs, Ogata confesses to Urabe, and when she tells Tsubaki of this, he goes into another neurotic worry fit. Not only does she not say “no”, she delays her response until the next day. He spends the night worrying, leaving he a bit tired the next day. But Urabe has a plan to test Ogata and Tsubaki to see which person is best suited to be her boyfriend. She performs the Routine with Ogata, with no reaction on his part. But with Tsubaki, a veritable fountain of blood flows from his nose.
At first it’s difficult to get them to trust you, Mellor said. “But once they see you are not going to arrest them, they relax.”
As for the residential density, I’ll take credit for coining the phrase “extreme density,” but the cogent point that the project would be double the next densest census tract should be attributed to the New York Observer’s Matthew Schuerman.
his bags will arrive at 21.40hrs.
I will be 25 weeks on Thursday (12/15). My OB said everything looked so good that I could wait a month to come in, my appointment is tomorrow (12/14) she didn't say anything about doing another scan to check the cervical length but I am not going to leave the office until they do, I just cannot handle not knowing everything still looks ok.
It is true that whilst there is a surplus currently of £2m but cuts in wages have 'saved' the council £5.6m leaving an obvious gap of £3.6m. This does not mean that cuts have to be made, rather on the contrary this presents a real alternative to fight and defeat the austerity measures driven by central government.
Problem solved. Mom thanked me and remarked how Jeffrey is at that age where doesn't like to listen to her any more (and I refrained from telling her to learn to control her own kid) and another woman in line gave me a smile and a little "golf clap". Jeffrey was still standing when I paid for my coffee and left.
There's some precedent.
We were completely stuffed and decided while we were up there we might as well do something else, so we decided to go to Kemper Museum of Contemporary Art! It’s a great little museum and admission is FREE! (I love free things!) There were a lot of really great works of art and I wanted to share my favorites with you guys!
Both Dexters generally select victims according to the Harry Code. Aside from the differences in the story arcs, there are some other differences in how the two Dexters choose their victims. Novel Dexter is inclined to only go after killers with multiple victims, especially if the victims are especially vulnerable (children, the homeless, etc), who who evade the justice system. TV Dexter seems to have slightly looser requirements for his victims and has, at times, manipulated evidence to make sure his chosen victim stays out of prison and within Dexter’s reach.
"But is anything worth anything Elvis?"
Heh, heh, heh. I'm challenging you b/c I know I'll never get 50 comments. :)
Mix together all the ingredients under “eggs” in a bowl and move the content into a pot. Place the pot on a low heat. Keep mixing the egg content as you heat it. Cook the eggs until it will look like the photo above. Actually you don’t want to burn it as shown in the photo… Don’t leave the pot like I did!
These dumplings consists of a sweet filling wrapped in a piece of dough. They look similar to the savory ones but are sweet and deep fried. The dough is made of egg, sugar, flour, water and lard (or shortening), and let rest for a while before shaping. It’s similar to making a flaky pie crust, so you can imagine the texture of the dumplings is also similar. In the filling, there are sugar, desiccated coconut, peanuts and sesame seeds.
“Excuse me?” The look on my face could wilt flowers.
ofcourse i was ...
I find it slightly disconcerting that there are people out there who may not understand the appeal of Hawkeye.
My wife and I were shopping yesterday and stopped by Cookies by George because we saw that one of our favourite flavors had JUST come out of the oven!! We wanted one.
It was this line, specifically, that gave me goosebumps:
thank you so much for your inspiring Time Has Told Me blog. It is really amazing that there still is so much great music to discover, even for an 40 year old longtime listener.
The use of the word performances suggests an opportunity to ‘act out’ an image and the potential for subversion and resistance as discussed by Jacqueline Rose in her analysis of Lacan.
you are the sweetest.
“Guess my line of work is different in the way that technology enhances performance in a minimal way. We take care of our old guys and gals; they have more valuable experience.”
The number of weddings has risen by 3.7 per cent in a year. Analysts believe the recession has caused a return to family values and a desire for the stability marriage offers.
I've been pretty literal with this one .... I've used my CC Designs, Swiss Pixies, 'Heidi among the flowers' stamp as well as my handmade roses for the May flowers part and then I've been even more literal and cut out some clouds and used my Bella 'raindrops' falling from the clouds. I thought I was being clever anyway lol.
I know I’m a little late on this here but it still confuses me. Fred Durst, of nu-metal group Limp Bizkit fame, is signed to Young Money Cash Money Business as an artist? I know that music moguls are always trying to sign diverse and up and coming artist, but Fred Durst? Really? I remember Limp Bizkit being one of the biggest bands of my elementary schools days when TRL ruled the air waves, but since then ego and money led to their downfall. I was didn’t even know that Fred Durst was in music or even had music indusrty friends. Limp Bizkit collaborated with hip hop artists in the past, such as Method Man, Redman, DMX and Xzibit, but haven’t been relevant since the early 2000′s. At first I thought it was a joke, but loe and behold its legit.
My personal journey as a writer was:
My hubby was diagnosed with a blood clot in his leg yesterday.....
They can't wait to try on their boots. Then their boots suck. Their socks are bunched up. The zipper is digging into their skin. Boots are the spawn of Satan.
Assistant Head, Academics
The first thing I want to mention is the simple space that is available in the Dragon Chow bag. I have included a picture of the seven sets of dice that I now have at my disposal. Keen observers will notice that four d10s are missing from the photo; I left them at our gaming host’s house and I will not get them back until later this week. (I really thought about holding off on taking the picture until the weekend, but I pushed through that nagging attention to detail!).
Graphic design students… you will be creating materials for a business of your own. I have included the details of the assignments in a MS Word file - Starting Your Own Business 2012 Assignments . You will be creating some of the same type materials as you have for the restaurant and band projects (logo, business card, letterhead, etc) but also have additional assignments such as a tagline, domain name, introductory letter, display board, etc. I do not intend for you to complete all the items for the project within one week! Be sure to do quality and creative work. I will give you deadlines for the project at a later time.
Link
I decided to go east and head into Cambodia because I figured it would be easier to get a visa for Vietnam in Cambodia versus Laos (we screwed up our diplomatic relations with Vietnam with that little thing called the Vietnam War). I ended up trekking through Cambodia, up the coast of Vietnam, through Laos, back to Bangkok, down into the islands and finally back to Bangkok one last time. The map below is a pretty accurate representation of my route.
2) The second one is: No. Some things are not easy at all, and not only for me.
Chilled Champagne
Do you have a writing library?
*I would like to comment that anybody, regardless of their religion or lack thereof is allowed to pray.
It's just how you take it
But speaking French eludes me. I don't mean exchanging a few lines with the cashier at Carrefour or placing an order at a cafe; I mean real conversation with tenses and articles and vocabulary that goes beyond phrasebook French.
Mr. Popper wonders why she won't marry William; doesn't she love him? She says she does, and dries her tears. He tells her he empathizes with her situation because his marriage to Isabelle was a lovely one, until he realized that he was hampering her artistic dreams and allowed her to move to New York. By the time William has returned, Mr. Popper feels it's best for him to leave instead of staying while Jane makes coffee.
We sold the big red diesel truck Sunday and the trailer today. Didn’t get as much as I wanted for it but we need the money to get a new pickup that is more reliable. I am thinking of running up to Ohio where we can go to an auction and buy a truck for a decent price. It would be great to visit up there again. Sure want to see the dad of my old friend, Bernie, who died last year. And of course there are others it would be nice to see again. Some of them are friends from a different life, a life I no longer care to live, but friends just the same. I think I am well able to resist the temptations presented there but will be careful just the same.
Hence every religious practitioner should understand the spirit behind the various practices by making genuine self enquiry. Once the use of the practice has helped reach a certain level, the person must let go and pick up the next level of practices. As one progresses from the physical plane more and more to the subtler planes, he or she is bound to feel the drop in level of activity. Ironically as one moves higher, the lack of activity in the practice could be so daunting that people drop back to the level of more activity driven world.
My birthday ended up being pretty darn fabulous.
The daily menus are just suggestions. Feel free to mix it up however you like! :)
Neuhauser, Krylon Market Manager. "We're proud to invest in the future of
On these cold November nights, a song to keep the cold away
Also, the “use” stage of all three types of lamps represents the most energy-intensive life-cycle stage, accounting for 90 percent of total life-cycle energy, on average. This is followed by the manufacturing and transport phases, respectively. Transport represents less than one percent of life-cycle energy use for all lamp types.
They don’t know how to hold a grudge or how to stop smiling. They are the epitome of unconditional love….they just will avoid a person if they don’t feel uncomfortable….they do not slander a person if they don’t somehow gel with them. They just trust their instincts and allow their bodies to tell them when to expect what. They are so open about what they like and do not like….they just don’t have the understanding of Judgement…..hence they are completely themselves where-ever they are. The curiosity and inquisitiveness which is so innate to them is what propels them to try new things without fear, they do not have even an inkling of what is it to suppress. They don’t get scared of being labeled as dumb or foolish if they don’t know something. They are just Pure Beings of Love and happy to BE.
02 (Sittin' on) The Dock of the Bay (Cropper, redding) 5:15
By the time I was driving to work yesterday morning, completely wrecked, both physically and mentally, I finally started to think about it. Everyone who I had told had weighed in on it, mostly telling me I’d be crazy not to take it considering the opportunity it presented financially. Mother had proceeded to attempt blackmailing me into taking it (our phone call was shortly terminated after that because I didn’t need that shit). My gut wasn’t really saying much aside from that it doesn’t want to be poor again because this whole being broke business sucks (bring on Friday – first pay day in two months).
The job of each of us, male and female alike, is to learn the specific needs to the people we love (and this applies to spouses, friends, siblings, and children), and to do our best to fill those needs. However, from conversations with a few female friends, I have begun to realize that men are taught this, but women often are not. So, at the request of one of those friends, I am asking each of you who read this (men and women) guard and treasure the hearts of the people in your lives. Care for them well, put them before yourself, and show them your love and affection every day. Stop being afraid, stop being consumed with your own problems, stop thinking nothing of those around you, and take up their burdens. That’s what friends are for.
All sorts of interesting publishing luminaries attended including Alexandra Pringle of Bloomsbury, Adam Sisman, currently researching a biography of John le Carré, and Elizabeth Speller (of whom more soon), plus the news presenter Emily Maitlis, even more glamorous in the flesh than on TV. (Later: I now hear I missed meeting Lesley Garrett!)
The bad news for me, beyond all that lack of sleep stuff, is that my sore throat is not going away, and my ear and head congestion is still present and my ear still is hurting and totally full of fluid. I’ll be talking to my doc again tomorrow to see if, with the info about the girls having strep, if he wants to rethink my diagnosis and prescription. He didn’t test me for strep or even talk about it, quite honestly. So who knows. I’m just ready to be done with meds and sick and all of this. I’m ready to be able to hear out of my right ear. I’m ready for my throat to not hurt enough to make me wince every SINGLE time I swallow. I’m ready for my eyes to not be blurry all the time and scary looking. I’m frustrated that we keep getting hit with this stuff. I’m tired of being powerless to keep them from getting the next thing going around. And I’m done hearing that “all kids who go to school get sick.” We’re past that. This is going on 4 months of almost constant illness. That’s just plain ridiculous. If I haven’t said it before, I’ll tell you now. Braska’s going to get an extra week off school next week. Call it “Spring Break: The Do-over.”
Level 3: Limb must be amputated. If it is in a critical location (ie torso, neck, head), the wound continues to do damage at a rate of 1 damage and -1 to all stats until either it heals or kills the character.
He’s so excited to be 18, so ready to take on the world. He marches to the beat of his own drum. A brilliant boy, a gifted writer, a kid who doesn’t do his homework but engages in lively classroom discussions and aces his tests, he has no current plans to go to college. He wants to graduate high school, get a job, and move out as soon as humanly possible.
mixed media creations by sUz davis
THURSDAY, JUNE 3RD
He had knocked the breath out of her. “Ju…Ju…,” she huffed. She crawled over to where her friend, Jumper, lay unconscious on the sidewalk. Everything was blurry. She rubbed her eyes hard, over and over, trying to clear them enough to see through the uncontrolled tears. She touched his chest, but her hand was shaking so badly that she couldn’t tell if he was breathing. She reached for his neck again, this time to check for a pulse.
Arrgghh! Fucking Canadians!
I vacuumed & straightened up the living room, vacuumed the rugs in the kitchen and sucked (with the vacuum) any dog hair from the corners.
The opening of lands by the means of Jihad is to destroy the material obstacles that prevent people from entering Islam. The objective is not to exploit the lands in the manner of the imperialists but to free men from the servitude of other men to the worship of Allah (Subhanahu Wa ta’ala). The proof that Islam never exploited or dominated in the manner of the imperialists is the success of Islam in melting the different nations into one Ummah.
867. Rocket Pop @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 4:19 p.m.
It is a little unclear what kind of Air craft Carrier they want to buy. It appears to be a helicopter carrier of the French Mistral class.
Across our site and down was a beautiful little sandy cove full of drift wood. It was perfect for sunning and swimming. Beyond that was a vast open meadow along the lakeside that nobody could access except by water. Perfect! I loved laying in the sun and exploring our new place with the children. The kids said I made the "best camp food ever" even though it was allot of warmed up thrown together left overs ;-) That next morning we all headed out on an excruciating bike ride up a mountain in search of another, yet more remote, waterfall. After lunch, swimming and sun some of our friends showed up to join us! Just then the boys pulled the canoe in with whole big mess of fish big enough to feed the entire camp of us breakfast!
On to less congested things...
I was so happy that I got to work with them for a Mother's Day mini-session. Both of these little girls are amazing! They put a smile on my face whenever I'm around them. And mama is a gorgeous lady herself--inside and out.
Beyond the mountains of China, nestled within lush farmland and not far from the city lay a small town. In this peaceful town, things seemed perpetually still. The water in the river made its way down the banks slowly, lazily, almost as if it were a bother to flow. In this town there lived a beautiful young lady whose name meant Princess and whose father was a great farmer. His hard work and selflessness had brought them great luck and immense wealth, yet because of this, the young Princess was spoiled. Her sour demeanor troubled her mother and completely overshadowed the existence of her younger sister, a quiet girl with plain features and a selflessness like that of her father’s. The princess however, paid her family no mind, assuming their love would return each year like the blossoms of the garden’s trees.
These numbers suggest that the increased bank lending that the central bank has allowed over the past month or so, even for small companies, is having some effect on moderating the slowdown in growth. Or at least overall. The official sub-index for small busineses fell in April by 1.8 to 49.1, highlighting how mixed and tenuous economic growth remains. GDP growth was 8.1% in the first quarter, its fifth consecutive quarterly deceleration. But with inflation still lingering, we expect the central bank to remain measured about further easing on both the monetary and fiscal fronts.
Saturday December 6
Of desire
Soledi Colon, 39, New York, N.Y.
I am slogging through the week. At a meeting at work yesterday a person I am coming to really admire said something like this: "We are exactly where we should be in this process. We are slogging through." Since this new process is what my new job is, it felt good to hear it described this way. We are not skipping through it, we are slogging, and it is a tough slog. Even the girl geniuses I work with are starting to have a tough time with it. I am not happy that they are suffering, but I am glad I am not alone.
Written by Ellie Bethel. Illustrated by Alexandra Colombo. Ages 4-8.
But the servicer would have to give the borrower three days’ notice before withdrawing the short-sale approval and explain why it was revoked.
“No…” Making a sour face, Emily shook her head quickly as she laughed. “Daddy’s are better. He uses his science to make them really perfect.”
Wrapped himself in death and praised Allah
And so Amazon and B&N said we will publish your Ebooks. They did not say that to the publishers. Amazon and B&N became publishers. Hey! Did I make a mistake? Amazon and B&N are not publishers, right? I mean they don't use only agents, they do not sign contracts, they do not give advances. So what makes them publishers?
Keep it simple, not complex,
Perhaps democracy could work, if there were legally enforceable bars to leftism, liberalism and socialism. Some examples might be (1) allowing only those who own property to vote (as in the early days of our founding); (2) allowing only those who are self supporting to vote; (3) assessing an equal tax on everyone, including the so-called poor, i.e. by a flat tax on gross income, so that those who vote for higher taxes will feel the effects of it in their own pocketbooks. When people are spending their own money, rather than someone else's, they tend to be a lot more conservative.
1-800-656-HOPE
"BUT WE CAN MAKE A REAL HOPPY BEER!" That's nice junior, time to get on the short bus!
Stay tuned to Breitbart News for continuing coverage on the Department of Justice exposé.
The AP Stylebook says different takes “from, not than”. National Geographic prefers different from “in virtually every construction” except when from “would require an elaborate construction”. Simon Heffer, who writes the Telegraph style guide (“different from”) declares that “Something is different from something else, not different to it and certainly not, as in one especially revolting usage, different than anything.” When one reacts so viscerally to variant prepositions, the risk of disgust is high indeed.
Fact is, Jesus Christ is the only reason the Law had any glory to begin with. The glory of the Law is that it tells a person where they are and points them in the direction they need to go. The Law is that glorious road sign directing sinners to Jesus Christ—the ultimate glory.
I am surprised to see that so many holy organisations feel free to reproduce entire and unauthorised articles with neither compensation nor permission, nor link backs. And they run advertisements on their sites, earning revenue from this!
Tomorrow, we’ll look at specific snares a female manager faces, versus those of her male counterparts. We can’t put back the forbidden fruit that started it all.
"Members and activists will be wondering where the negotiations over the LGPS have got to.... The joint negotiating team and the Governance and Administration sub groups have continued to meet on a regular basis, the most recent meeting of the negotiating 'Project ' team being this afternoon - Monday 2 April.
I spotted this wreath online a couple weeks ago and had to have it. I was aching for a crafty project, and this fit the bill.
Since then I've returned to the house to get my art stuff - the last remaining belongings of mine. I nearly got thrown out of the house. Big row about the cars etc, since the new car is in my name and he wanted me to sign it over to him or get out of the house. I told him I wouldn't sign a thing until he signed his car over to me and then I marched in. But we got it sorted in the end. I brought the car documents with me and off I went. And as I walked away I told him he'll be seeing N on my terms now.
After that, I drank a Pilsner Urquell, a Czech beer that prides itself on being the original Pilsner, which is a particular type of lager, the last true style of beer invented. The Urquell is good, but not as good as the Brooklyn.
Haha!
independence, our constitutional order.
Friday was 100 times better because I actually worked out back at CrossFit Instinct! It was me, my sister, and a fellow female member (she’s going to Regionals yay!) and we did a partner-trio WOD-
There were hats and chocolate mustaches.
I’m putting in as much foot work as I can and I’m barking up as many trees as I can and reaching out to as many people as I can. I’m praying that something pays off and I am able to begin this new journey.
And I am at work today and sans-kids so the ride home could get a little colorful if these damn morons don't get their driving shizz together!
I know that he's dreaming?
I know for myself, I cherish every moment I have with the boys. Gamer is eleven now and wanting to do more things on his own. PB is four and still has a hard time hugging or showing affection at times.
Yarrow has long been associated with magic and divination, and is considered by some folk herbalists as a sacred plant with special spiritual powers to offer protection. Yarrow stalks are traditionally used to cast the I Ching, the Chinese book of prophecy. The herb was also believed to be useful in love charms and in conjuring.
06. Tuning (1:23)
little mama.
Ps: It’s time for Gaysexuals to STOP BULLYING their agenda on the rest of America. Marriage is for EVERYONE but to REDEFINE the earth is not a wise idea! Get wisdom and in your ‘getting’ get knowledge. For the truth always works.
In the early days, I thought it so important that I try to have more presence with them that I actually set a timer for 30 minutes at a time and did not let myself go look at my email, or refill my coffee cup. I treated it like meditation: when my mind would start to wander, I’d just gently bring my attention back to the girls. Over and over again.
Professional tradable service employment in the US is so scarce that the University of Florida has abolished its computer science department. As few of the graduates can find employment, the university has reallocated the department’s budget to football, a paying sport.
Oh holy crapping crap. Monkey spanking asshats.
Consider these facts:
In between washing piles of ski clothes and vomit from the 2 year old's car seat (tantrum, chunky pizza, please don't ask me anymore...) I thought I'd pop in and say hello.
his insults
One aspect of Immortals which really irritated me was the Minotaur, which wasn’t obviously a Minotaur until right at the end when the story is carved out for us in a greek statue. The reason for this deception is you are presented with an ordinary bloke, wearing a barbed wire bull helmet that does very little but bash in some bollocks and make grunting noises that sound like he is desperate for a laxative.
Disclosure: I received Hasbro toy samples for review purposes only; no other compensation was received for this post. All opinions expressed are my own.
Meanwhile France has temporarily closed its high school in Bamako and has recommended (though has stopped short of ordering) its 5000 citizens in Mali to leave. Now the U.S. State Department has initiated “authorized departure” of its personnel and their dependents from Mali, and the Peace Corps program is suspending its work here.
Don Juan by Lord Byron
4. Schoolgirl (Ballard) 3:22
Fresh Peas from our garden
Was it then
Frank: International treaty, all skeletons come from India.
So some more really boring sword fight scenes – like you have no idea how boring these things are – McLeod and Connery make it through the maze. Connery sacrifices his life for no reason. McLeod and Ironside finally square off right by the generator machine, and Ironside is beheaded in typical Highlander fashion. Connery’s voice narrates from beyond the grave somehow and says they must work together to destroy the shield and break down the walls under the sky.
But haughtiness has blinded you,
He bent down slowly, his jaw clenching as some misaligned joint caught or some bunched muscle was asked to relent.
Written, filmed, edited and directed by Silverchef Productions.
As is always the case, the result was announced immediately after the closing of the polling stations, at 8pm on a Sunday evening. I remember the faces of shock and surprise, and a moment of confusion before it became clear that Le Pen would continue into the second round of voting. People took to the streets to protest, but against what exactly was not entirely clear.
Can we be a family?
Smoking is bad for you but smoking is a choice. The ads are telling teenagers that if you choose to start smoking you are choosing to become a "slave to tobacco" and thus, choosing to submit to its influence. Right on. On the other hand, sexual abuse is so far from being a choice it's not even on the same planet as the word 'choice', and as such someone who is forced to perform oral sex did not choose to be in that submissive role, so to even imply that they are the same thing is just disgusting.
Remember to stay sunny!!!!
Meanwhile, the UN is now declaring that the entire oceanic system may be bereft of fish by 2050. The waters are not, in fact, larger than us.
John knew how to conduct an interview, and I always looked forward to reading them in the Chronicle. Apparently I wasn’t the only one; John’s tenure at the Chronicle lasted 33 years!
More. Oh, there's no more?
As you know life changes quite regularly with toddlers. Now my eldest little one rarely has afternoon sleeps, and the youngest one has started cutting them out too.
You may think your blog profile is set to show your email address, but it just takes 2 seconds to double check. I get so sad when I know people are blogging all over the world and there isn't an email address attached to their account to enjoy the communication back and forth between bloggers.
If you would like to join us please call on 01234 855833
Dr. Charles Grob MD. Has made extensive research in Ayahuasca’s effects, from the clinical point of view, as well as other hallucinogens.
Around my wrists.
Studies have however suggested that cilantro only moves the problem to other parts of the body and thus must be used with another agent to complete the detoxification process.
In reading John 9:1-12, I find a Savior who has some friends that are preoccupied with some smaller stuff. Even Jesus has some things happening in his own life (road to Jerusalem, you know, to his death?). Yet his willingness to God’s will doesn’t waver and helps someone out. Jesus relies on the Father to do the work, to be occupied with others instead of himself, to help others see the world around them as God sees it.
My friend's husband, meanwhile, has managed to get from the ICU to home in three days! The bleeding on his brain stopped on Thursday and by Friday the blood was re-absorping and the swelling in his face was going down. He could open his eyes and the opthamologist determined that he would not lose his eyes. While he will have at least one surgery, after the swelling is gone, we are all blessed by his quick turn around. We feel optimistic and he feels well enough to watch basketball and talk about going fishing!
Now i recall it was a split second decision in which we decided to trip at the copse there and then…D, A and me. Like wildfire everyone knew this was the plan.
How long, from Him, will you try to hide?
Marc Garneau shared with me his visual approach to simplifying radicals.
I'm also appreciative that Budweiser is central to the American barbecue, our country's unique contribution to world cuisine. Now you will find culinarians and Cicerones pairing barbecued meats with a wide spectrum of beer styles including Smoked Porters, Milk Stouts, Dunkel Weizens, American Strong Ales, Saissons and other beers the typical barbecue pitmaster would find hopelessly exotic. With all due respect to the extensive training, experience and super sophisticated palates of these so-called culinary experts, they are dead wrong. The correct beer pairing for any barbecue is a Budweiser served exactly one nano-degree Fahrenheit above freezing temperature. No fancy, schmancy glassware is required, as it is perfectly acceptable to drink it straight from the can or bottle. If you insist on glassware, a frosted mug is the preferred choice. This fact is widely understood from Kansas City and Texas all the way to North Carolina, and I dare say you'd be wasting every one's time lecturing folks who've enjoyed barbecue this way for decades on proper beer serving temperatures and the pairing of contrasting or complimentary flavor profiles. The fact that beer plays a major role in bringing friends, family, and neighbors together over a simple plate of barbecue is one of the the great things about beer, even if that beer comes from some evil mega-corporation.
Tucker was not so excited about getting in the Ocean he only got in once for a few minutes and he spent the rest of his time playing in the Sand with Grandma Schlatter and making Sand Castles. About 2 months after we got Home he came running up to me one day and said "Mommy, I am ready to get in the Ocean now Let's go to the Beach!!!" Ummmmmm Tucker we live in the smack dab middle of Kansas I don't think we can go back to the Beach anytime soon LOL!!! Tooo Cute! :)
Person you would most like to meet: Jim Rogers (the investor, not the Duke Energy CEO)
Where to buy?
½ tsp. table salt
9. Good Design is Environmentally Friendly
Toast hamburger buns and serve with freshly sliced tomatoes, lentil-walnut burger and yogurt sauce. Enjoy!
Now I have another bill I can’t afford.
It seems that there was a great deal of speculation in whisky in the 1890's. Whisky consumption was increasing and this had encouraged distillers to make more and dealers to buy in greater stocks. Maturing whisky in bond looked like an easy way to make money. Every year you kept it in stock, its value increased. At least it had until 1899.
I look into her eyes and feel the warmth.
“Where are you going to be?”
UNLESS this is when opportunity meets preparedness. What if I was just about to complete a couple of coaching certifications? What if I believe I now have the “street cred” as a business professional and a horse person to give me the confidence to be the front man to help take the messages that my big, noble co-facilitators want to share with the world? What if the Universe was conspiring to give me the safety net I still need to step out confidently and let my heart-inspired message go forth?
wish me luck!
The past week or so has consisted of a lot of running around and interviewing for thesis research. This week, none of that.
So, why is Lincoln such a controversial figure in our history? The Emancipation Proclamation certainly was controversial at the time, and people in his own party viewed it with skepticism. But it was also his decision to suspend Habeas Corpus during the war that has become one of the most controversial decisions of his presidency. But with war brewing, and calls for secession in Maryland, Lincoln knew that to keep the Union from totally collapsing, he would have to take drastic steps in order to do so. While controversial, and against the law in some cases, he did what he thought was right, and in the end, his actions did help to keep the state of Maryland in the Union, preventing Washington from being surrounded by the Confederacy.
Sorry no posts….Report coming on Qingdao (of beer fame) & its well-cared-for eastern province of Shandong, home to more Party officials than any other province. Big report to come on The Great Sage Confucius, whose hometown was one huge lesson in filial piety. More soon on the calisthenics TV show we like to call, “Exercise With Happy Minorities.”
The next morning, nothing had improved and I was in complete agony. I went to the hospital for x-rays and thankfully there was no fracture. I decided that since I had experienced a similar injury in the past that I knew what to do to fix it (it sounds ridiculous hearing myself say this now!) and that it would take a lot of time, icing, joint mobility exercises and tedious strength movements to improve the durability of the muscles and tendons surrounding my spine to prevent something like this from happening again. As it turned out, had my back and neck muscles NOT been as strong as they are, I could have easily snapped my neck on impact.
Nora, I was asked by your mom to be present for your delivery. Oh my God, what a humbling experience that was. Of all the people in her life, she asked me. Maybe she knew I needed this for something painful from a past experience with my job. That seems like the kind of person she is… thinking of others in the midst of her unimaginable circumstance. I don’t know why she asked me, but she did and I can NEVER repay her for doing so. There are no words to describe that day or the moment you arrived and let out your first cry. Nothing I could possibly say could do justice for what was felt by all who witnessed your birth. You cried and then you seemed to need a little help. Your nurse, Amy, brought you to the warmer as all gathered around with anticipation. I saw no movement in your chest at all. You weren’t breathing. Amy moved the stethoscope around as if trying to listen for something… ANYTHING that indicated a beating heart. Your mom was sobbing, her hands folded and pleading desperately with her eyes lifted toward the ceiling. I went to her instinctively as my job once required me to take care of mothers. Your dad and aunts and nurse were by your side. I knew you were being cared for. Your mom cried out in desperation for God to please help you. She was terrified and I had never seen or heard terror like that in my life. The doctor requested the pastor come in for your immediate baptism, as it looked as though you were not going to be with us much longer. Your dad must’ve slipped in when he heard your mom’s desperate plea. You see, Nora, your dad loves your mom like God intended for a husband to love his wife. What a lucky baby you are to have them as your earthly parents! Suddenly, we heard a cry from the warmer. It was as though God breathed life right back into you. Your mother asked, and God came to her, giving her what she needed right then. I will never forget that moment for the rest of my life.
It just left her heart exhausted and bruised,
Use a weekly Wiffiti for "Shout Outs" to share praises, allow questions, and gain feedback. On Fridays it is fun to allow students the opportunity to reflect (appropriately) by sharing on a Wiffiti. This takes no class time as students text in on their own time and the Wiffiti board is show before the bell rings. This makes good use of down time, offers students a safe way to share, and gives the teacher a way to provide recognition where all can see it without the time it would take to make
This part leaves lots of room for interpretation... We use chicken breasts but if you would like a different meat such as pork or steak feel free to substitute. Also, you can cook the chicken in whatever way is easiest for you. We usually do it one of two ways. I either cut the chicken into small cubes, season it, and cook it in a skillet. Or I season it, cook it on the George Foreman grill, and then cut it into pieces (or shred it).
Lastly, garnish chopped cilantro
4/24 vs. Miami, W 78-66 (W -7), Under
There were banana crumble tarts, banana cake, choc pistachio cake, raspberry panna cotta, pinapple cheese cake, fruit jelly, raspberry crumble, lemon cheesecake, brownie, muffin, creme brulee, blueberry slice, sago, etc
I've used the new Elisabeth Bell image that I won at the Digi Bell's March blog hop. Her name is Lil Lillian and I think she's almost as cute as my Lil Lilly. I've been wanting to use some of the new Memory Box, Cheery Lynn, and Poppy Stamp Dies I got a few weeks ago and just got around to it. Thanks to Selma for the inspiration for this card. I know I saw something similar awhile back on her blog. She does wonders with these gorgeous dies and making flowers, so if you haven't been to her blog drop in to see the beauty she has to share.
Overcome with despair, Marlin leaves Dory and begins to swim back towards his home. Dory then loses her memory and becomes confused, but meets Nemo, who has escaped into the ocean through an underwater drain pipe. Dory’s memory is suddenly restored after she reads the word “Sydney” on a nearby drain pipe and, remembering her journey, she guides Nemo to Marlin. After the two joyfully reunite, Dory is caught in a fishing net with a school of grouper. Nemo enters the net with bravery and directs the group to swim downward to break the net, reminiscent of a similar scenario that occurred in the fish tank earlier in the film. The fish, including Dory, succeed in breaking the net and escape. At this point, Marlin is no longer overprotective or doubtful of his son’s safety. After they get home, Nemo leaves for school, accompanied by Squirt (Crush’s young son), an exchange student.
They pushed the wheelbarrows through the parliamentary gates and across the cobbles up to Tuynhuys, through the Tuynhuys gates, right up to the door, to the delight of the photographers, cameramen and journalists covering the event.
"And I ain't not going to never call youse ever again."
“I was busy, I had little choice in the matter―“ Ramiel cut him off with a wave of his hand.
After a period when car companies were moving production to China, some are now coming back, said Vivian Olmos, vice-president of business development at North American Production Sharing, a company that supports manufacturers in Mexico. …
The side of the house never saw the sun and the side door led into a rather dark sitting room, opposite the door were stairs with a cupboard underneath, all wood panelled and painted a very dark brown. A door to the right led into the front room which was only used on special occasions and there was another door to the left up a couple of steps into the living room. Near this door was another giving access to the stairs at the top of which was the landing and from this were three bedrooms and a box room.
hand crafted, the surface of the pencil is carefully plated with a thin layer
This is it. This is Christmas, right here. Cribs and static Nativity scenes go back at least as far as the 13th century, and the more I look at this one the stranger it begins to seem. There’s nothing new in devotees producing statues and figurines to illustrate their gods and goddesses, but what’s startling about the Christmas scene is its very ordinariness. There’s nothing magic here, only scruffy badly-dressed people sharing a stable with some rather surprised looking animals, but at once it’s something even the poorest can relate to. Louis XIV’s peasants mightn’t have seen much of the goose and even less of the presents, but they could see and believe in this scene – and they could participate in it too. France is still famous for its santons – the little terracotta figures of saints and holy figures produced at least as far back as the 16th century, and now a thriving specialized industry in Provence.
I almost always nut out my overall design digitally before committing to scissors and glue, so I get the best of both worlds... a digi page and a traditional version. This process is what keeps me motivated and challenges me in working out how I can reproduce the digital elements and textures in the traditional format without having to rely solely on printing them.
(202): I forgot it was 4/20. that COMPLETELY explains the 7/11. i was like “that’s a lot of white dudes…and they’re really into snacking.”
Bring the entire mixture to a boil and once it is so, let it simmer in low heat. Add in the bacon and beef and cover with a lid and let it slowly stew for about 2 hours.
I planted 20 bean plants--but cannot see them!
Week 16 Butterfly
Me: "Yes, I did know that. Where did you hear about that?"
America is in a situation so dire, in so many ways, that it can no longer afford the lying leatherette upholstery on its aging hemicuda bought with money borrowed or printed wantonly. It’s time, among others, to give the finger of derision to the R-taboo, to stop the evasive noise about “divisiveness” and to highlight that “toleration” is very far in meaning from “celebration.”
The highlight was meeting readers who'd come to the event just to meet me. THAT. WAS. FABULOUS.
But I am truly fighting deceptive forces?
Sunglasses
A bog is where peat is grown. As new peat accumulates on the top, the older material underneath begins to decay and release humic acid which has a pH level similar to vinegar, allowing the peat to conserve human bodies the same way fruit is preserved by pickling. Peat bogs that lack drainage are highly acidic and devoid of oxygen, effectively preventing microorganisms from decomposing the body, hence the well-preserved bodies.
And then there suddenly appeared before me
(50% of the proceeds will be donated directly to their adoption agency)
The Occupy movements around the country and the world are garnering overwhelming support from the general populace. While not everyone has the means to physically participate, there is much we can do on a collective level to help bring our point home to global corporate interests. In this spirit, many of us seek non-violent ways of demonstrating our repulsion at the vast control these corporations have garnered while infringing on our civil rights as they wage their global destruction on all that is true and fair. It is one thing to stand in a man’s front yard to demonstrate your dislike for his conduct, but another thing altogether to refuse to participate in the system from which he gains his resources for power. To annihilate a social cancer, you must become willing to starve it. In this light, we have choosen a date for the following activities (or non-activity, as it were):
My younger child has been craving for something as chocolaty and rich as brownies...but a really good tray of brownies has got too much fat and sugar, despite his constant pleadings, I would only bake them on special occasions. In order to fool the boy to eat my bakes, I replaced some of the plain flour with cocoa powder...so as to make these muffins look close enough to be the slightly healthier cousin of the brownies :)
On the divan are piled (at night her bed)
Any my design wall for today. I got two more swoon blocks done (the ones on top are the new ones), two more kitty corner blocks and I started a new practice quilt. I'm going to try quilting baptist fans on this one. I"ll keep going around with rainbow colors, yellow, green, teal. We'll see. I'm on vacation all week. Husband is working, kids are back at school and all I have to do is sew :) Does it get any better????
City have won this battle, but now it is up to them to make sure the war is won.
But in the right context roe deer can be very “Disney,” with their spindly legs and dewy eyes.
IP: Well, the 20mph zones are mostly all near schools. Because there was a nasty accident, years ago, two children were killed. It’s 20mph because at 20, a child is likely to survive, but at 30, a child is not likely to survive. And people like the speed bumps. I’m unsure if drivers will really obey speed laws unless the bumps are there.
So if things like that get you embarrassed or uncomfortable maybe taking the food out doors is the best solution for you.
Bridegroom is One, the bride is one also. There was only one Noah s ark, outside which no one was saved at the Deluge ; there was only one tabernacle constructed by Moses, only one Temple at Jerusalem built by Solomon for sacrifice and for worship ; only one Synagogue the sentences of which were legal.
Pretty neat, huh?
In the view of western and Afghan sources, the old mujahideen commander single-handedly took the shine off what otherwise would have been the finest hour for the country’s fledgling special forces when he intervened directly during last week’s battle with insurgents in Kabul. The minister took command of a team trying to fight its way up a building, ordering them to rush the final assault.”
try to keep his head up
I often wonder why I write, but I do know why I like the Museum of Innocence. To me, more than anything else, it offers a glimpse into a great mind. Strangely enough, rather than being overwhelmed by all its detail, it helped me see a bigger picture.
They look up with their pale and sunken faces,
Eyjafjallajökull has erupted five times since human settlement in the ninth century and its most recent eruption has been going since March 20th this year, but it is only in the last week that ash from this eruption has reached the stratosphere of its continental neighbour.
I am looking for some deer hunters who may want to donate meat and get sausage back…..
Do it for the Boothen end and it’s deafening sound
“They’d surrounded me as well so I couldn’t move. There was a thought that he wasn’t going to be here with me.”
I hope you are having a gorgeous and joy-filled Friday wherever you are!!
For so a date I’m bound to keep,
Luke 18:1-8 ¶ And he spake a parable unto them to this end, that men ought always to pray, and not to faint; Saying, There was in a city a judge, which feared not God, neither regarded man: And there was a widow in that city; and she came unto him, saying, Avenge me of mine adversary. And he would not for a while: but afterward he said within himself, Though I fear not God, nor regard man; Yet because this widow troubleth me, I will avenge her, lest by her continual coming she weary me. And the Lord said, Hear what the unjust judge saith. And shall not God avenge his own elect, which cry day and night unto him, though he bear long with them? I tell you that he will avenge them speedily. Nevertheless when the Son of man cometh, shall he find faith on the earth?
I found etsy and said, "Well, my comics are hand made. What have I got to lose?" I started me store and with in 24 hours I had my first sale. My second sale took a bit longer but I past 500 sales this year. I sell me books at comic conventions as well as etsy. If there are other sites that I could sell my books on, I haven't found them yet.
For my Dt project this time, I've chosen the adorable image "Out There" for my project.
She says she will make up for it today.
He added we will talk about my job arragement (i am still waiting) and wished me a nice holiday.
We’ll be looking at this and other tricky interview questions in my Interview Preparation Masterclass in London on January 11th. Click here for further details.
“After being a judge for over 20 years, I think I can decide on what weight to give the tools available to me,” Judge Snook said.
He reached out his hands for her and she gently held them. They talked till dawn and she took her leave with the first bird; leaving him yearning for her.
Boil Size: 7.29 gal
But when hubs and I went to Tagaytay for a quick breakfast just recently, I ordered the Grilled Chicken with Pesto and Shiitaki Mushroom sandwich for him. And, surprisingly, while I did enjoy my banoffee pie that morning (yes, I had it for breafkast.), his sandwich made me salivate more than my pie! The scent of the pesto filled the entire coffee shop as the barista warmed the sandwich in the micro. After a tiny bite just to taste it, I was almost ready to exchange orders with my hubs!
He added that it will be 5-6C colder than the average May minimum over the weekend.
Here’s what he told his readers in the April 1, 2011, Global Market Perspective (emphasis added):
My feelings were happy and my mind empty as I went back up my street. I started getting a hard-on imagining all the fresh fanny I'd get to slice after I got rich off my new idea. But in the ennui of my mental triumph I once again experienced a dark bleed-in of all the guilt I felt at swindling Imaginary Granny in the Old Folks' Home. It were a guilt exacerbated by the cocaine comedown that no amount of grass (bought for the purposes of mental comedown buffer) could shield me from.
And, of course, some continued work on cooking from the pantry!
And of course I decided to make myself a collar rather than just test it out with a small cuff. And I miscalculated my length and added entirely too many "Pineapples", if that makes any sense.
One of my best friends, Calleen Brown, got married this last weekend! Hooray for weddings!
We have finally decided to pursue it and sign on with an agency. We've met with an agency that focuses more on Domestic placements and next month we meet with another agency that is more focused on International placements. There are benefits and disadvantages to both. Either way we go, it will be a very long and expensive process so we want to make as informed of a decision as we can.
1 failed
But I was unable to let this dress go to someone else.
The shadow is pretty cool too.
Well, this is an interesting choice from Jackie and it makes a bit of a change. There is as he says a definite reggae vibe to this particular group but their track People of Zion throws in a bit of dance too and you know what? if it got the right airplay in the right places it could actually take off as a bit of a novelty. There is more than hint of early UB40 in here too. Some people might find it ridiculous that an Irish fella is talking about Zion and ‘tearing down the walls of Babylon’ but why should it be and frankly that the main singer uses his own Irish accent is quite refreshing. You’d get a pain in your Nat King Cole with all these singers trying to sound like Landaners or New Yoikers. It’s an interesting track, and although the pause in the middle is a little long, we’re looking forward to giving it a spin on the show later.
We had a lovely afternoon with our sweet friends from the Chuan. I'm glad we got to taste the flavors of Thanksgiving without me having to cook everything.
Then today I received this response from my Landlord…Angela:
Your still sweet
When all of the ingredients were stirred together in the crock pot, the recipe instructed to put on the lid and cook on LOW for 8-10 hours. Mine did NOT cook for this long. At around 6 hours, I checked on the sauce and realized that it was burning at the bottom and around the edges. And not just a little bit...parts of the sauce were black and stuck to the bottom of my slow cooker. I turned off the crock pot and scraped the bulk of the sauce away from the burned parts (discarding the charred stuff, of course). When it was time to serve dinner, I simply re-heated the sauce. From my experience, every slow cooker is a little bit different (for instance, mine always cooks a little bit fast), so if it's possible, check your sauce around the 4-5 hour mark.
Now, I’d like to answer several questions I’ve received recently. Of course, I am not a legal expert, so if you have further questions beyond these please ask someone who is. Below is what I have come to understand through this experience, and please note that I do not speak for every designer.
Brogue Kick to end the chant….well said Sheamus…well said.
Using a toothpick dipped into the black chocolate, randomly drag chocolate stripes across the heart. It's been awhile since I've had a photo illustration in this post, so now would be a good time:
The grass is getting greener, the trees are budding, and the flowers are blooming! All signs that Spring has Sprung!
My mother heart wants to stand in the way and protect James from HSSH’s incredibly twisted thinking. I want to fix every wrong accusation, because I fear James choosing HSSH over me, or being deceived, or drawn in to HSSH’s delusions.
tip 3. assume that the photo shows the piece in faaaar superior condition than it will be in person.
Orla's Laternefest is this evening. Sadly, I don't think I can go as I already had plans for tonight. So Stevie will get to do his first Laternefest with Orla & Hamish. I was looking forward to it as well, especially after I did a double-take on the school newsletter which says "If the weather is kind the event will be held outside. There will be sausages and hot chocolate available after our lantern-lit walk through the woods. In order to cover the cost of the ponies we will have to ask for donations on the night.". Do you think we get one to keep? Or will we be eating horsey-sausages???
In terms of character development, Cornwell does a few interesting things that are worth noting for Game Masters who have players engaged in more than only dungeon crawls. For example, Sir Simon is a powerful knight of great skill and ability for the English. He is a noble born. Thomas on the other hand, is low born and an archer and a bit of a wild card. The two do not mix and through various bits and pieces, the two become enemies that seek to kill one another to the point that Thomas is hung and Sir Simon defects from the English to the French.
So we are saved by faith in the shed blood of Jesus Christ. We are bought with a price, the full value of the exacted payment. But one will read Matthew 6:14 and 15.
One of the marbled-headed CCMystery7 girls does appear briefly (seriously: was her hair cut by a 2nd grader?) but it’s basically a T-ara -only affair.
Hi everyone. Despite my lack of blog posts recently, I've actually been reading a lot, I just haven't had an awful lot to say about any of the books. However, I felt it was about time to share some thoughts on a few of the things that I've been reading.
They encouraged. I heard things like You Can Do It! Way To Go! Keep At It, You Are Doing Great!
August, 1947
Finally as a mirror just to make sure there are no stucked vegetables in between your teeths.
Suggests all records from Social Security, Immigration, Hawaii birth records be made available to see if there are criminal charges to be filed or not. Without them, nothing can be ruled out.
In other words, “popular fiction,” “chick-lit,” “beach books.” Oh, please. I understand that many writers and publishers and critics care very much about the distinctions, which are handy labels for booksellers and librarians, but most readers don’t. They’re looking for good books of all kinds, and, yes, covers can signal appealing subject matter, but so what? The contents are what counts, and a great many readers happily turn the pages of Anne Tyler, Anne Rivers Siddons and Anne of Green Gables. (Also Anonymous, but that’s another story for another day.)
100g cake flour, sifted
Zach is currently giving me suggestions instead of writing a paper.
2. Burger Joint Waitress, age 15. There is a diner in Oregon City (where I grew up) which employs almost exclusively high school kids and the few stragglers who uh, still work there. I started working there after dropping out of high school, and sometimes kids I'd previously been going to class with would pop in around lunch time and give me a hard time. My boss was kind of crazy, but she's since passed away from cancer and I can't bring myself to make fun of her on the internet. There was a cook who worked there that I loved, and he passed away a few years ago, the only funeral I've ever been to. This job was definitely a pretty formative experience in the food service industry for me, and it was one of those on again, off again jobs that I'd go back to when I couldn't find work anywhere else.
The Avengers comes out in theaters this Friday, May 8th. Are you going to the midnight showing? Become your favorite Avenger and Geek out with these amazing props to celebrate Marvels newest film.
Since having written the following I've gained much more insight and information, particularly as to the causes of what is described in the message below, but the the causes do not change the expected outcome. It was written almost a year ago, but the message to whites remains the same, STAY OUT OF IT!
You have 'til February 29th at noon to play! You will be entered into the draw for the digi prize no matter what image you use!! Be sure to come back all throughout the month to see what our talented design team has come up with to inspire you!!
"My salary doubled because we were losing all the policy capacity in the federation. The economists and accountants were all gone, because if you keep the salary at R250 000, it means the economists can't make those sacrifices for years and years. They lose out," Vavi said.
“While economic Marxism appears to be dead, the Hegelian variety articulated by Gramsci and others has not only survived the fall of the Berlin Wall, but also gone on to challenge the American republic at the level of its most cherished ideas. For more than two centuries America has been an ‘exceptional’ nation, one whose restless entrepreneurial dynamism has been tempered by patriotism and a strong religious-cultural core. The ultimate triumph of Gramscianism would mean the end of this very ‘exceptionalism.’ America would at last become Europeanized: statist, thoroughly secular, post-patriotic, and concerned with group hierarchies and group rights in which the idea of equality before the law as traditionally understood by Americans would finally be abandoned. Beneath the surface of our seemingly placid times, the ideological, political, and historical stakes are enormous.”
Freddy: See? You made me hurt myself again! I broke my hand off completely at the wrist this time, Tina! But that's okay, Darlin', because I love you, and that's why you have to let me EAT YOUR BRAAAAAAAAAAAIIIIIIIIIIIINS!
I mark the vista of waters, I mark the uplands and slopes;
Summer games are the best. First you grill out with your friends and a whole bunch of strangers – you may even end up playing bags or pong with them. When you’ve set your coals to cool, you head into the ballpark to sit in the sunshine (hopefully) and watch your boys play.
Since I was in France, I couldn't pass up the opportunity to spend a few days in Paris, retracing my steps from last year and revisiting some emotional places. Taking lots of notes. Taking lots of research pictures. (Big surprise: the story I'm working on has to do with my Paris experiences last year!)
Yet a relatively small rudder directs the huge ocean-liner out in the middle of the waves and winds and seas. A little rudder keeps it on course.
If I sold 100 copies of a single title through YouWriteOn I’d earn £84.05, but by publishing it myself I’d bring in £101.25. In this instance, self-publishing is a better option by a margin of £17.20.
1. So Hard to Explain
(Looks awful doesn't it, but it was a great trek and very accessible, we saw one lady walking her dog)
I decided to share with you my Christmas beanies. I looked and looked and looked for a pattern that spoke to me and was something that I really wanted to make over and over and over again. I never found one, so I made up my own pattern.
takeover of health care!
For the water empire to succeed, it is necessary to destroy any form of social mobility not dependent on the centralized system. The only way to do this is to make it nearly impossible for the working class to transition to the middle class and the middle class to the upper class through commercial activity. The only possible form of social mobility is to be through government service.
A man in Murrells Inlet was arrested for having $419,000 worth of marijuana plants and another $11,760 worth of processed marijuana.
about to complain but I’m rest assured
Tomorrow is our PD day, Tuesday is Staff Meeting in morning then the afternoon to prep. Wednesday is the official first day for the students.
Lets see what this sketch looks like in the eyes of my fellow LSC Chicks!
Democracy is on trial in the Philippines, and surely it will emerge victorious as a permanent way of life in this country, if each of the great branches of the Government, within its own allocated spear, complies with its own constitutional duty, uncompromisingly and regardless of difficulties.
I didn’t know what to say.
Last weekend I was down in Portland, Oregon area for a training in EAP for work. It's a really interesting model and if you're in the health care field I recommend you take a look at it. EAGALA (Equine Assisted Growth and Learning Assoc.) puts on trainings throughout the US and abroad (for some reason my boss didn't think it was necessary for me to go to Europe or South America to get certified...???) and offer them pretty much year round.
You can tell something great is about to transpire just by listening to the way Klaus Schulze's synthesizers were starting to percolate on the soundtrack, and, if you really want to get analytical, by the manner in which Lasse Braun's camera seems to be focusing on a white door. Who's behind the door, I wondered, and what will this person find once they finally breach its ashen threshold? All of a sudden, the door swings open, and Catherine Ringer steps through it, closing it behind her with a campy flair. Wearing the same get-up she had on when we first met her (a black leotard and a pair of red thigh-high leg warmers), Martine is standing in a room full of naked and scantily clad men and women who are frozen like statues.
So first, I have created a few cards today, will post separately.
‘Cut a check and shut up, they said’.
Privately made recordings of Nance’s first concert date, at Fargo, North Dakota, on November 7, 1940 by Jack Towers and Dick Burris, are probably the most effective display of the band during this period. These recordings, later released as Duke Ellington at Fargo, 1940 Live, are among the first of innumerable live performances which survive, made by enthusiasts or broadcasters, significantly expanding the Ellington discography.
PASSING
I cut her out and placed her in a die cut shape and inked the edges in gold. I've used the same Christmas papers that I used the other day (just can't help myself! lol) and placed a punched border strip at either side of the middle strip of dp. Some ribbons from my stash, a few flowers with a Inky Dinky Drop in the centre and a handmade paper tissue flower which I covered in stickles :)
“It’s amazing, isn’t it?” Elise said quietly to her daughter. Creme could only nod.
Get beer lines.
Do you have any ideas for unusual vases for flowers?
Hundreds of mourners are expected to turn out for his funeral at Portsmouth Cathedral tomorrow.
Never mind, next year there will be another national championship and I'm sure I can qualify again and do better. If not, I can still meet the same great people at the competition and enjoy doing a sport together with the people I love.
Ma fin est mon commencement.
On to my objection. Suppose that these studies were conducted not in the relative anonymity of a college campus in 1978 or 1982, but in a small town in, let's say, Germany or France, in 1678 or 1782. A man walks up to a woman, out of the blue, and propositions her. The answer to what would occur next is, I think, that he would be extremely fortunate to escape with his life. A woman in those places and times, and indeed in virtually every other place and time since the dawn of man, was normally under the protection of men, either her father and her brothers if she was young and/or unmarried, or her husband and his family if she was married. And all of these men would look quite askance at any man, much less a strange one, accosting their relative with a request for sex. Violence would be an entirely typical reaction. I would even go further in stating that even if a woman had no living relatives or was a spinster or widow, men in the community, likely to be related genetically, would not look kindly on the interloper.
be for me protection in mind and body,
“You’ll see,” I responded. “I WILL succeed. I WILL go one year, without spending!” I am wondering if her total lack of support is a sort of reverse psychology move. She tells me there is no way I can do this, so I feel the need to prove her wrong. 364 more days to go. I can TOTALLY do this.
REPORTER: Oslo.
Boulder Beer / Wilderness Pub Crushed Hood Stout
I'm late in the game and you may have already done your decorating and planned your Christmas purchases. But just in case you're late, too, I want to say that you're welcome to order one. They're $40 and I need about 5 days' notice.*
I will be sharing a lot more about our trip and our adventures while there. For now we are planning and reading and learning. Look at this beautiful video. Incredible India.
But I am thankful that you read, follow, put up with my weird sense of humor and less then perfect pics and hopefully fix some of these great recipes!
Jonti I hadn't heard of before and after hearing 5 minutes of his set (I was already 15 minutes late) I decided to record the end of it and it was quite lucky because the first track of this recording is genius! Got to check this guy out some more.
And brown lentils with a hint of cumin,
Dear Father:
After appearing as the house band on The Bob Burns Show, Spike got his own radio show on NBC, The Chase and Sanborn Program, as Edgar Bergen’s summer replacement in 1945. Frances Langford was co-host and Groucho Marx was among the guests. The guest list for Jones’s 1947-49 CBS program for Coca-Cola (originally The Spotlight Revue, retitled The Spike Jones Show for its final season) included Frankie Laine, Mel Torme, Peter Lorre, Don Ameche and Burl Ives. Frank Sinatra appeared on the show in October 1948, and Lassie in May 1949. Jones’s resident “girlsinger” during this period was Dorothy Shay, “The Park Avenue Hillbillie.” One of the announcers on Jones’s CBS show was the young Mike Wallace. Writers included Eddie Maxwell, Eddie Brandt and Jay Sommers. The final program in the series was broadcast in June 1949.
That left only the lawyer to make the change. He grumbled and complained, but went out to the barn. Moments later there was another knock on the farmer's door. Frustrated and tired, the farmer opens the door, and there stood the pig and the cow.
no doubt the universe is unfolding as it should.
I do remember playing spelling games with my sister, where my mother would say a word and both of us would try and spell it properly. This was always great fun to me!
Eat lots of chocolate. I will.
Wash your Hands Wash your hands, using soap, and wash them often. If you don’t have soap, don’t worry. The rubbing together of your hands under water is what removes the virus from your skin, not the soap. Hand sanitizers are not necessary.
Elvis Costello: Pump It Up
Heres my bag charm, I added the stars and pearls myself :)
Unconfirmed reports say President Aquino was the first person to visit www.president.gov.ph. However, something unusual happened when Noynoy accessed the website. A popup window appeared and said, “Game Over.”
i can't get off.
"Now, what did we learn from this?"
He'd built an empire once. And then destroyed lives.
The Byrds
And when you are having a bad day, when you respond harshly, when you say "no" and then realize that you had no reason not to say "Yes!" your children need to be able to trust you to own your behavior. They need to know that you will apologize, make it right if you can, and that you will continue to try and get your own needs met in different ways so that you can better meet the needs of your children.
I have to say if I worked full-time out of the home I think I would embrace this concept pretty enthusiastically. If no one gets home till 5pm or 6pm then I can see having a pre-made meal defrosted and ready to heat up makes perfect sense, especially when you also have to juggle homework, family time, baths, walking the dog, laundry and who knows what else.
Then it happens. The moment everyone in this triangle has been waiting for. The baby takes it's first breath of air. He enters the world. I could only imagine the thoughts that go through the birthmom's mind as she hears those first cries. My heart shrivels up thinking about the decision that she will be making.
I miss you so much and I don’t know what to say
Before their second set of three songs, Mick (playing - and sitting on - the box) thanked the PR company insincerely for putting Circus Envy on after Rodney Branigan, a young American now living in south London, who had made us all blink by starting his set with a number that involved playing two guitars simultaneously.
He lay before me, sated and happy, but I could focus on nothing but the tingling in my clit, still alive with energy from the friction of rubbing against his stomach as I rode him earlier. I began to laugh through the tears. ‘I’m sorry my love, but I was wrong. I NEED to cum!’ He just smiled again, and I rolled onto my back as he lowered his magic tongue between my thighs, his hands on my nipples again. Despite the intensity of my desire, the first orgasm still took some coaxing, but when it arrived it lifted me up in deep waves of pleasure, seeming to radiate through every muscle in my body. He paused, giving me about half a minute to recover, then licked me into a shorter but still delicious second set of climaxes, then after a slightly longer pause, my favourite third set, always shorter but sweet and pure, light, bliss…
When Nick blows into town, he’s stunned to discover that his no-nonsense new neighbor and co-worker is the same sultry creature he seduced for one night of forbidden island pleasure. He’s unaccustomed to staying in one place for long, but he just can’t seem to keep his hands off the multi-faceted Lissy. Will Nick break loyal Lissy’s heart or will she be the one woman he simply can’t walk away from?
He turns me toward the door.
He wanted her to stay
And looking all cute and innocent in the bottom right corner is an adorable Tiny Cthulhu stitched by Carina. The hand-stitched eyes really make this one look sweet, and perhaps a little bit curious?
still sewing dolls
Asa was the first of eight ‘good’ kings in Southern Kingdom of Judah. The good kings would follow the ways of the Lord and in some instances seek to eliminate the places of idol worship thereby restoring true worship to the land. Asa sought to remove the perverted person’s from the land but failed in eliminating the high places of idol worship. If we desire to serve the Lord in the long term, every form of evil must be eliminated.
When I turned 14, everything went to shit. My Step-Dad was drinking and getting high every night, our Mum was absent. I was looking after my five-year-old sister and two-year-old brother (who was born within months of moving). My other brother, who was 12, stayed in his room. Our Step-Dad took out a personal vendetta against him not long after moving. He was a mean drunk. I would hurry to cook, clean everything up, and put the kids to bed before he came home. He would come home tired sometimes and just pass out. But other nights were worse..
I know - - I'm weird.
The laws and regulations they pass are designed to export the industrial and manufacturing base of the United States to other countries. They are designed to destroy our energy base by restricting oil prospecting, fuel production, and nuclear power plants. The Jesuits in the House, Senate and regulating agencies restrict the private use of land with nonsensical environmental rules and regulations. They pass laws and regulations about what is "proper" to be taught in schools so that children will grow up being extremely ignorant under the banner of being educated.
Here's how you win:
but that phenomenon that’s femi-nine—
food $16.65
For more inspiration and to see all the Top Three cards and TEAM S.A.S. cards in one place, go to our Pinterest Board here.
Now the biggest questions I receive are about dropping the feed dogs on your machine. Most books written about free motion quilting, and most teachers that teach this technique advise you to drop your feed dogs down into the machine.
City or country, rural or populated, any setting holds the possibility not just for conflict between characters, but for being a part of the conflict itself.
If you are free tonight get down to Grampian Hospitals Arts Trusts launch party at His Majesty’s Theatre:
Only my best friend, during this jovial conversation, would be quick to amend her statement:
Step 8: Stretch out each piece with your fingers into a rough square with the centre being thinner than the edges. The only issue: our dough squares didn’t want to stay stretched! Eventually, Clare and I wound up with 4 oval pieces of dough.
“With more showrooms to be opened across China, Lotus is confident of its sales volume increasing further,” he says in a statement.
The statue, by sculptor Martin Jennings, was unveiled on the Hull Paragon Station concourse
Loyola (Illinois) wins 60-58 over Cincinnati-Ncaa BB champs Huskies (N.Illinois) 21-14 victory over SW Missouri State- College Division Da bears crushing Green Bay twice they went on to win the NFL championship against NY gmen
*Love and Intimacy
Sourthern Tier Choklat - A sweeter imperial stout with good chocolate characer.
Enough babbling, on to the mani:
You might say I went right up to the factory
Now to let you know what else is going on. I am in the home stretch of a new apron, one that has been lots of fun to create. I need to pick up a few more feet of rickrack/rick rack, very frustrating when you run short! Pics to follow!
This of course at the time when Mr. Gaddafi was an international pariah.
a day full of twirling.
The critics are pounding PETA for a perceived cavalier attitude towards the physical abuse of women, and the proponents want everyone to just freakin’ lighten up.
With a wicked pack of cards. Here, said she,
50g pure cacao powder
Let's not talk about their three boys who roll in wearing real-estate suits and earrings, not a shirt cuff to be seen between them. Who to blame for this surfeit of colortexturestyle? Is it the sartorial manifestation of the instant gratification generation, everything now at once in one dress? I think I prefer the Tummy Tucker jeans.
We'd love it if you'd put our blinkie on your blog to help spread the word... the more the merrier! You can grab the HTML on the side bar.
At the entrance to the church, a further clue that this was not a centre of fundamentalism. A sign reads "Ici on enseigne l'humanité" (here we teach humanity), and a quick look at the church website reveals discussions about encouraging homosexuals into the fold. It seems then that the artist chose the worst possible steeple in the city to place the evolutionary comment!
The Riviera Organ Preservation Society presents Ken Double at the Mighty Wurlitzer with special guest, Skip Stine on trumpet
I believe most of you who read here are all bloggers yourself. I think I'm fairly accurate in saying that many of us go through these little "blog crisis"? Sometimes I try to analyze what this means. (because I'm like this...) I think that perhaps what it comes down to is finding the balance of freedom of expression and not getting to caught up in this crazy culture of over-sharing. For the most part, I often feel that I don't publish many of the things I want to talk about because I don't know who is reading this anymore. When I started blogging years ago, I would at times send out emails with my blog address, link it to the Etsy shop, link it to facebook, who knows where else... It makes me a little uneasy for many reasons (all a little silly, but still things that I consider before hitting that "publish" button) Despite the fact that I can be very opinionated at times, I don't want to offend. I don't want to say something stupid I will later regret. I don't want people leaving me mean comments. (the last part is terribly silly, but also honest)
Of the three responses, only the first actually trains the person. It is only through true interaction with the problem-space and making mistakes and fixing them that the student actually indelibly grasps the material. The second is acceptable in some cases but certainly does not have the effect of the first. A hybrid approach of utilizing both techniques is better.
-Who in clothing: young men, Lederhosen
This was a fun hat to knit. A little like the Koolhaas pattern; but easier since you don't have to hold stitches. That's not to say I didn't screw up the pattern several times anyway. Some of the rows are more confusing than others, but there are detailed instructions as well as a chart.
There’s also the job searching/networking theory of putting yourself out there. I guess that’s good for a lot of things. If you want something good to happen to you, it’s a little foolish to hide out at home, talking to no one. It simply can’t find you.
G is for Garden. I love playing in my garden. Pulling weeds (and working out long lost muscles at the same time) is actually kinda fun.
I feel both dressed and relaxed in this skirt. Great for work and for snuggling up on the sofa with my great new Susannah and Trinny book.
After a crippling mix of relief, anxiety and grief, I have quit my job. To stay at home. To pursue... something. It's funny, because everyone expects that that something is photography as a career. And maybe it is? I think I said in my resignation, "to stay at home with my boys and work on photography" and the telephone game turned that into "pursuing photography part-time," and then, "bravely starting her career in photography" or something like that. The City Manager even included in his speech at my send-off party his approval of my pursuing "my obvious talent" and said he was envious of my ability to do it (quitting my job to pursue a passion). I'm really appreciative of those apparent votes of confidence, because quitting my job ranks up VERY high in the Top 10 Hardest Things I've Faced In My Life List. But, I'll be working very hard to use these next few months to find what's right for me, next. I have to recognize that what's right for me next may not always be what's right for me always. But, I'm really looking forward to trying some things out.
The Board ruled that "a specific commercial connection between applicant and the Mohawk tribe has not been proven." The license and the d/b/a certificate are not evidence "that the tribe endorses or is a sponsor of the cigarettes applicant intends to sell."
10. Time to make your binding. I cut my binding fabric 2.5." If you are new to making binding, follow this tutorial. Sew on as you would quilt binding but do not sew it to the back of the cover yet.
Pretty easy, right?!
I gathered up everything I needed. “I’m going to take a bath,” I said. “You can never go down to the water when I’m down there. Are we clear on that?” (Anna)
Ahndien, sole survivor of a heinous raid on her peaceful village in the Eastern Kingdom of Tian Kuo, embarks on a journey to find her father, now a captive of Torian troops. What she uncovers surpasses anything she can imagine as she masters the ability to manipulate fire.
peering out the window
The discussion of debts and the way she bluffs Loki are enigmatic as hell. While some reviews have said that the SHIELD Avengers suffer a disservice in not having their own movies, I would say that it adds more to their characters as spies that their pasts are not completely unveiled at this point. I can’t wait to see more of her in the future and see what she’s going to do next as, unlike the other Avengers, I genuinely have no idea.
Her tresses have blackened and embers fade
Here is the treat bag set i finished today,this one is long due in my to-do list.I actually planned only to make a bag,then ended up with a matching box and a card also.I really don't know why,but till now i don't know how to make a ordinary paper bag,have seen the demo in television couple of times but some how i dint got my mind and surprisingly i couldn't found any tute in the internet for it so far.If any one knows,please give me the link.I have made this one as similar to box,with three sides.Made two pieces like that n attached it,hope it looks like a bag,lolz.
And even willing to burn a few baby knee pads. — Lenore
Story time I made the mistake of correcting his pronunciation of a word and he lost his shit and went Nam. He takes any sort of criticism so hard and when he’s tired he just can’t help himself. Dudette told him she loved him and left. I turned off the light and got into bed. He sat on the floor and hit himself in the head with the Dr. Seuss book we didn’t finish. I let it go because I knew he wouldn’t do any damage like that and I knew he desperately wanted a confrontation with me. So I closed my eyes. He went on for about a minute then stopped. As soon as he did I opened my eyes and looked at him with slight sympathetic ’I'm not mad’ smile. He started again and I closed my eyes. He stopped and says, “Who asked you to be in here?” I raised my head and said, “Do you want me to leave?”
As the significance of all that had happened in less than a minute was being absorbed, a woman with a pre-school child, unaware of the events, walked onto the grounds and pointed out the Dr. Seuss sculptures. The child squealed with delight. A truck backed up to the grounds and people began unloading equipment for a musical performance by Joe Velez and Creacion that was scheduled to begin just a few hours after the shooting. One of the men unloading the truck whistled a lively tune.
these are simply my thoughts this morning, and i hope they help you in some way.
A influx of about half a million (63,000 families) internally displaced into the Districts of Khyber Pakhtunkhwa, formerly known as the North-West Frontier Province, has sparked grave concerns among international and national NGOs in Pakistan, according to a Joint Press Release by Pakistan Humanitarian Forum (PHF) and National Humanitarian Network (NHN).
In North Korea, really, we are talking about Igno-Think. They know only what they are told. What they have been told since they were born. Nothing exists outside the North Korean bubble. Life continues, self-contained. Only the country exists. In these circumstances, it is entirely reasonable to believe that, in England, the main food must be boiled rice.
Today is a good start to prepare for an election that will shape our nations destiny.
Before I share my card, I wanted to also share that Bazzill Basics has done a Lawn Fawn color match for the Bright Side paper and Bazzill Basics cardstock. This is such a great tool, and really makes sure that you get perfectly matched cardstock. We have the matching Bazzill cardstock, and let me tell you....it really does match perfectly. Bazzill definitely knows what they are doing! And as Lawn Fawn adds new collections to their arsenal, it will get updated on this color match page! So, with all that said...here is the card that I created for tonight!
Unfortunately no further information on the man has surfaced since I posted Mavin’s third single back in November, so you’ll have to make do with Mavin’s own sleeve notes – printed in urgent capitals on the actual cover, which I’ve transcribed for you here complete with original syntax and punctuation errors intact:
But my daughter is someone who needs more than that. My daughter needs some consistent redirection when this side of her comes out. And that is what she will get from us each and every time something like this happens.
The Anemic Poop
I’m sorry Beyan. I love you to death, but loving you would probably result in death. You called it the Bible Belt. I agree with Ben that it is the Bourbon Belt, both because they make my favorite libation there and because you need to drink a lot of it to deal with people like Beyan’s dad.
When used well, radio is a powerful and effective medium. And it can make other media more effective when it's on the schedule. Maybe it deserves a bit more love?
But in the end–as they would always find out in the drill simulations–their number always would come up sooner or later.
2. My biggest change of late has been letting an extended digital cable package with onDemand go. To me saving $ was worth letting channels go (although I miss being about to watch The Young and the Restless after work). I feel like I'm at work for most of the day anyways, not at home watching TV, so why have a million channels? Plus, most of the shows I want to watch are on regular old channels, such as The Bachelor and American Idol.
Skills: Fighting-d10, Notice-d8, Psionics-d10, Spellcasting-d10
Love is the Adventure is a blog my my dear friend Elizabeth, and when I say “my dear friend Elizabeth,” I mean that quite literally. Elizabeth and I have known each other since childhood—we were best friends when our families lived in Germany, which also happened to coincide with each of our most ghastly awkward phases. See proof below. So yes, Elizabeth and I… we go way back. And reconnecting with her via social media has been an absolute joy. This girl and her blog are fabulous! Intelligent, wise, funny, and an excellent writer. I dare you to read chapter one of her and her husband’s love story. I promise you will then immediately read the rest, or at least bookmark it for later, and of course love Elizabeth from then on, period. Me too. :)
It is important that you are very careful when copying the code. With any code like this even a single space where it does not belong can cause the code not to work.
#4 leans close to watch.
To be honest their recruitment campaign is news to me, and the article says they don't even advertise here - so clearly it's the EU's fault for not being inclusive towards the second-biggest member, not the British graduate
Hello world. Meet a former roommate’s kitty. His name is Handsome. Here you can see him dosing on a blanket over my pillows. He really liked that spot, direct sunlight and all.
Cake Poker Rakeback amounts up to 33% of the total amount put on stake by the player, participating in one of the games. The poker room uses US currency and thus, it can be convenient for the players from all parts of the world to enjoy the Cake poker rakeback advantage.
Hope you are enjoying my creations as much as I am enjoying creating them. TFL
“Policies of disappearing, torturing, and murdering significant numbers of citizens were aimed at imposing a passive consensus within the population. Everyone knew about the “secret” concentration camps, woke to see or hear about the disfigured cadavers of torture victims rotting in the streets or floating in the rivers, knew someone whose relative or friend had disappeared. While the terrorist state spoke of the need to respect the family and social order, entire families were attacked, destroyed, and violated.” - Nancy Caro Hollander.“Uprooted Minds: Surviving the Politics of Terror in the Americas.”2010. Routledge: New York. Pg. 108.
with mononucleosis,
“I don’t understand – so it was you who set me up?”
She turned around, slid the drawer, and pulled the biggest knife I'd seen in the house.
You were a reason to stop - if I needed a reason to stop - and I was grateful for your graceful excuse, halfway up that long slow climb. And while I stood beneath your hometree's branches, breathing deeply, admiring you and all your sisters, the old woman who has tended you for years came home. I'd never talked to her before.
Ephesians 5:15-21
OK, so I know for a lot of you who read my blog every week, it was a bit of a disappointment to see nothing about the last two weeks. Well, I didn’t disappear, and I didn’t fail you in following through on those reviews. I simply failed to post the link and summaries on my blog. But no more! Kora is back in action and her reviews are still here!
to keep her from a
Speakin' of freakin' car accidents, the Doc falls asleep at the wheel on the way back from the prison, and it's determined he needs a break!
He survived thanks to the rapid response from the local health services and in the meantime has been making a full recovery. I have been busy running the business for him while he recovers which has left little time to tend to any of my more creative pursuits, let alone blogging here.
The course already etched into my mind
Paused, I think, hold this position until breathing stabilizes. Adopt a deeper, fuller breath. Adopt a deeper, fuller life.
Are you a workbox user? Please comment and leave links to pictures of your system. I'd love the inspiration!
That would not be a good thing.
- Process art making is being spontaneous and suspending judgment.
As the cold mountain breeze hits you, take a moment to enjoy the beauty of the grand Rocky mountains and the vibrant city that surrounds you. Salt Lake is most well known for the 2002 Winter Olympics. Skiers from all over the world flock to Utah to enjoy the “greatest snow on earth.” Salt Lake is also known for being a popular tourist attraction, with a rich cultural history. If you are going to be in Utah, here are the top things that you should visit/do in this city.
“Great,” said Anne, fixing my shirt collar and stroking my jumper down flat and respectable. She straightened herself, ditched her cigarette, and followed me in, the two of us looking like liberal bank workers or people with money pretending we had none. When the young girl heard us talking in English she glanced up and sang a big friendly “Bonjour!”
Having made this acknowledgement, the logical next step is to delete this section. One cannot make this cut on the basis of promises of pie in the sky. Virtually everyone in Irish society, including myself, would love to see a Scandinavian model of child care being in place by the end of this year. I differ from some of those who claim it would not be possible, in that I believe it would be possible were there a real will and determination to make it happen. However, significant resources would be required. This defies credibility, given the fact that this idea is coming from a Government that is slashing, burning and cutting left, right and centre and is committed to considerable further budget cuts in the next two years under the EU-IMF austerity programme. If we pass the fiscal treaty, we will be required to make even more severe budget cuts in subsequent years. From where will the Government get the money and resources to put in place a Scandinavian child care model? The Minister and I would like to see such a model. Ireland did not put it in place when the Celtic tiger was in full swing, yet the Minister is telling the House that she will have it in place within six months at a time when austerity butchery is cutting everything. The Minister does not honestly believe it will be done.
you keep talking about how i am the one who refuses to grow up, yet my understanding and willingness to associate and work with humans and organizations is restricted to those which i consider moral actors. not people who “go to service” and treat each other like crap the rest of the time, but an actual examination of all of our acts and interactions. i know a lot is contained in what i just said. what part do you want to look at? oh, that’s right. you already have a neat little pre-packaged reality that already answered all of these questions to a much greater degree of verbal back-flipping than you yourself are capable of producing, eh? you think that excuses you of responsibility?
For Mr. Obama, the visit was a chance to meet again with Mr. Karzai, with whom the United States has had a sometimes difficult relationship. On a stop here in March 2010, Mr. Obama delivered pointed criticism of Mr. Karzai for the rampant graft in the Afghan government. Ten months later, he made a return trip, only to be grounded at Bagram by swirling winds, forcing him to speak to Mr. Karzai by phone.
This trend is interesting and all, but is there a scientific reason for it?
She was telling me how strong her little 5 year old boy is. That when a baby comes in to their home and then leaves, the 5 year old will come up to his mom and pat her on the back and say, “It’s okay mommy.” I know. She told me he is stronger than she ever could have imagined.
The final tags are the ones I received last month, the lovely golden H for happy hearts from Kathryn and the beautifully coloured I for Ipomoea from Sarah - thanks ladies, two lovely additions to my growing collection
Day 16
The hardest part about traveling with Jaxon by myself was going through security. I had to hold him, try to grab a bin from the ground and put my shoes and belongings inside. I also have to take out Jaxons bottle from a zippered pocket and along with my cell phone and put it in bin too. Luckily each time we went through security we had someone nice there to grab a bin for us and put it on the table. Putting everything back into our bag was hard once it passed through security's x-ray machines. It was just a lot to hold onto Jaxon and do all this at the same time since he is still so small to where he doesn't have complete head control.
The film would’ve been better without it, because the introduction of this story angle – that Loveless was responsible for the murder of an entire freed black town, including West’s parents – makes this a revenge flick, which puts that subplot at odds with the generally comedic presentation of the rest of the film.
It was no surprise that my interest in history would mount to the level of research and writing myself. After years of doing historical research in fixed regions of Holland and carefully touching the neighbouring countries, I have now taken it upon myself to find out what is true of the myths and sagas. During these last months of my basic research in gathering data I have found a lot of information. And slowly I’m getting a closer look into what caused all this. The general gist being careers – yes, some of them actually worked – in diplomacy, politics and the army. Okay it might not be as virtuous and God fearing as working the lands with ones bare hands, but in their days bowing deeply, licking heels and flattering foreign monarchs and officials whilst trying to prevent wars or improving the understanding between countries, was considered a job. As was beating the living daylights out of someone when it all went wrong and nations took up arms. Colonial domination could be ranked amongst them also, but is also connected to the former – along with trade. And last but not least: The times they just had to run to save their sorry rears.
Including but not limited to:
Outside of the weird kid who ate crayons in class, few people seem to have a real appreciation for crayons, and I think that’s a shame. I think a true Crayola Connoisseur would be able to take a crayon that is missing its little rolling paper and still be able to name which color it is, likely based on its smell and texture. They’d probably get confused between Mahogany and Shit, though.
in crowds, surreally tired;
The previous owners spray painted it a flat brown color. They had primed it too...yeah less work for me.
I was shown into the attic chamber by a grave, intelligent-looking man with quiet clothes and an iron-gray beard, who spoke to me in this fashion:
I freaked! These were pre-photoshop days, we were shooting 10X8 with no prospect of retouch – the car had to go…
-Contains malt barley for healthy coats and glucosamine for healthy joints
I’ve hit on a string of erroneous beliefs here. No doubt we all have these: coping mechanisms, misinterpretations, rules learned as children that don’t hold water. What are yours? Do you see faulty beliefs or patterns of thought that exacerbate your suffering? What is your suffering like today? What would bring you relief?
Married my high school sweetheart and been together for 17 years...wow, that sounds like forever.
For the tweety card, I also added a spiderweb (also from Wildcard cartridge) on pg. 68 and is the frame. Denver and I sprayed it with my homemade white pearl glimmer mist to give it that beautiful web shine!
Time always seems to be the best judge of quality. Upon its release, The Thing did poorly. This was because 1982 was the summer of Steven Spielberg’s E.T.: the Extra-Terrestrial, and many dark science fiction films did badly in the shadow of that wondrous, fantastical film. Blade Runner, which opened the same weekend as The Thing, also suffered at the box office because of this. However, since then, The Thing and Blade Runner have become two of the most revered films of the genre garnering massive praise, and are recognized among the best works from directors John Carpenter and Ridley Scott, respectively. They are both amazing films in different ways, but have both influenced the genre immensely.
I did get a little concerned one day, however; when he started telling me EVERYONE else's lunch numbers! I made him double pinky promise that he would never-ever try to use any of his friends' numbers at the lunch counter!
"No buddy, some kids are not as fortunate as others, meaning that they don't have any money for Christmas presents. Would you like to buy these kids a present?"
Sometimes: Girls Nights are SUPER fun.
“Yes there is,” I protested.
Bring 6 cups of water to a boil in a Dutch oven or large pot, then add the green onions and ginger. Add the chicken, make sure there is enough water to cover the chicken, and return to a boil. Lower the heat to a bare simmer and simmer for 10 minutes. If you’re using a whole chicken, during the simmer time, lift the chicken out of the water and make sure the stock in the cavity empties back into the pot. Do that 3 times for a whole chicken. For chicken pieces, gently stir the pot once or redistribute the pieces so they cook evenly. After 10 minutes, cover, turn off the heat, and allow the chicken to poach undisturbed until the water cools almost to room temperature.
There were always three eaglets
The scene where an adrenaline shot needs to be administered to the moll in order to revive her is, I believe, a re-enactment of an anecdote from the excellent Martin Scorsese documentary, American Boy: A Profile of Steven Prince.
When I started this blog, I was struggling to get a decent job. And don't get me wrong, I'm looking forward to it. Left to my own devices too long I regress to overgrown facial hair and stained t-shirts. But I felt like I was just getting the wheels to start turning with my art. I got a website together (sort of-- it is still a work in progress) and I had some promising prospects. But the universe can't wait forever for me to "explore my dreams" and I'm not exempt from the reality of bills any more than the rest of you. So time to do the responsible thing. Hopefully I can still carve out a little time to be creative. I may have to give up a reality show or two. I guess we all have to make sacrifices.
Do you like the cover for Izzy Rahman’s single Away? Drop a comment below!
But not tonight.
We'll huddle down behind the light and fade like magazines
Mom: Well we will deal with that in about 13 years. But you can live with me forever if you want.
* Your Christmas list consists of nothing but hunting items.
On to the update!
Highly recommended. (Some language.)
I also journalled in 3 spots - around both circles and below the photo.
And with that, I guess I'll finish the story.
He has a new love interest . She is six years younger than me, a million kilos lighter, lives close to him, much prettier and does not have the “baggage” of a child. She exudes the vivaciousness that only youth can provide you with. I feel so defeated. There is not way I can compete with that. I will fail every time. My self esteem has reached a newfound low. The man I thought would always love me has traded me in for a newer, better model.
7. Spend Some Time Together
Ask children and youth what they already know about cyber-bullying. You might be amazed at how much they can tell you. Ask if this has ever happened to them or anyone they know. Make sure that the young people in your life know that:
1 tsp kosher salt
So, since I didn’t set any goals for March or April (thus far), I’ve decided to start a challenge today. It’ll run through the end of May so it’ll be a total of 45 days. I’ll be tracking it using a Google Docs spreadsheet linked below. You’re welcome to create your own challenge and tracking sheet on there as well.
I started running mid April 2011. It was hard. I learned very quickly, that I wouldn’t be great at it just because I was fit. So what was interesting was that even though I didn’t like that I wasn’t good at it, I grew increasingly inspired to get better. As I saw with Barry, practice makes your body respond. So I began practicing.
the eyes are kind
But long as there are stars above you
As I drove I was giddy at the thought and couldn't wait to get back home to share this discovery with you. The site is loaded with people who are writing of their experiences of being out there in the world and doing good. You can even make your own personalized page and hook up with others in your community who are doing what you like to do.
So the work is democratic in the realm of consumption: bright, appealing, fun, and approachable. But at the same time it is servile in production, with an uncredited army of workers carrying out tasks that don't allow for their own individual expression. And this is how it becomes a representative work for our times. Late capitalism, after all, promises us all kinds of freedoms as consumers, and courts our favor in the realm of consumption, seeking ingeniously and tirelessly to give us what we want. But in the realm of production ours is an overwhelmingly hierarchical system, with freedom of action reserved for those in positions of authority, and real constraints put on the creative expression of those lower down in the order of things. I mean, take a look at what you're wearing — unless it's a Savile Row tailor-made suit, and if you read this blog, it isn't — it was made by the skilled hands and hard work of someone who had no input on how it looks, or how it is stitched together. From sweatshops to cubicles, the story of production is often much the same.
I painted everything fist and then I put a thin coat of Mod Podge over it to act as a sealer (I didn't have any spray sealer on hand).
Society must be vigilant and cautious of our military industrial complex e.g. DARPA, which are using research to produce drones and robotic soldiers on the on the battlefield. In past 10-years, the United States Army has increase the number of robots, from 162 to 7,000 for a multitude of missions. Many are insinuating that these latest destructive technologies could eventually evolve into human like intelligence.
That dang white box challenge would make me lose my mind. I would hate to know that I finally got my big break on national TV and ended up having to make a rug out of paprika. . . .
